Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> ["Russian Federation President's Message to the Federal </F>
Assembly" "On Strengthening the Russian State. (Basic 
Guidelines for Domestic and Foreign Policy)," signed by Russian 
Federation President B. Yeltsin and dated the Kremlin, Moscow, 
24 February 1994] 
  [Text] Introduction 
  Russia is now experiencing one of the most important stages 
in the development of its state system. At the end of last year 
its first-ever democratic Constitution was adopted by national 
ballot. 
  Despite highly acute political struggle and spiritual 
turmoil, despite tremendous mental and physical weariness, 
Russian society found the strength to take a difficult yet 
crucial step on the path to renewal and stability. And that 
enhances its value many times over. It is the duty of all of us 
who are actually involved in Russia's destiny to make the most 
of this opportunity. 
  Two years ago we began the painful but ultimately necessary 
and healing reform of the economy. With tremendous difficulty 
we moved away from the edge of the economic abyss into which the 
old system was irreversibly pushing us and began the slow and 
not always confident move toward recovery. 
  Last year we momentarily looked into another chasm -- that 
of 
civil confrontation -- and recoiled in horror. We now have to 
do everything we can, and possibly more, to ensure that this 
never happens again. 
  The Russian Constitution is not only a symbol of our 
striving 
for national accord. It is a real basis for establishing 
cooperation in Russian society, primarily between the branches 
of federal power. Among the thousands of highly complex 
problems facing Russia today there is none that can be resolved 
amid confrontation and mutual mistrust. The resumption of the 
implacable struggle represents the way to deadlock, and there 
will be no way out. For those to whom Russia's citizens have 
entrusted the governance of the country it represents the route 
to political disgrace, damnation, and eternal oblivion. 
  The ideological vacuum that arose after the collapse of the 
old system is now being filled with futile disputes about the 
advantages of various "isms." Too often they become symbols of 
confrontation and hatred, signs of disaster. 
  We must all realize that a state cannot be built on ideas 
that cause schism and polarization in society. It must be based 
on natural values and concepts geared to the whole people and to 
every person individually. Such as security, freedom, 
prosperity, and solidarity. 
  Our strategic aim is to make Russia a prosperous country 
inhabited by people who are free, proud of their ancient 
history, and look boldly to the future; a country in which 
authority is based on law and does not oppress the citizen; a 
country with an efficient economy combining national features 
and world achievements. 
  This aim is cherished and understood by all Russian citizens 
regardless of their convictions, political orientation, social 
and property position, age, and nationality. We will be able to 
achieve it if we rally around the common practical task of 
strengthening the Russian state. We have the main condition 
needed to perform this task -- the Constitution. It outlines 
the legal framework of a strong and stable democratic state. 
  For us the main guideline in this work is the 
Constitutional formula -- Russia is a democratic, federative, 
rule-of-law, social, and secular state. 
  We must strengthen the Russian state because strengthening 
the state means: 
  -- reinforcing its institutions and establishing normal 
collaboration among them; 
  -- creating a normal mechanism for its interaction with 
society; 
  -- finding the optimum means for it to participate in 
economic processes; 
  -- creating effective mechanisms to ensure and defend the 
rights and freedoms of every person regardless of nationality, 
religion, or social position; 
  -- providing Russian citizens with confidence and 
tranquillity in their country, on the streets of its cities and 
villages, in their homes and apartments; 
  -- securing a fitting place for Russia in the world 
community. 
  Russia will not be strong unless it is united. The most 
lasting guarantee of the country's unity and the equality of the 
peoples inhabiting it will be the implementation of the 
principles of federative relations enshrined in the Constitution. 
  Ordinary human values, respect for democracy and for the law 
will become ingrained if the state actively promotes the 
formation of a civil society, supports civil democratic 
initiative, shows farsightedness during the complex transitional 
period by supporting culture, science, and education, and 
establishes dialogue with various religions and faiths. 
  A rule-of-law state must be strong in order to guarantee 
people's security, fight crime, and take the offensive against 
corruption. 
  A strong state is the basis for continuing reform, 
overcoming 
the crisis, organizing the structural reorganization of the 
economy, and creating the conditions for its stabilization and 
development. 
  Russia has an interest in ensuring economic, cultural, 
family, and ordinary human ties among the new independent 
states. A highly important condition for this is for each of 
these states to acknowledge the priority of human rights and the 
need to defend the interests of ethnic, cultural, and linguistic 
minorities. 
  It is in Russia's interests to create favorable external 
conditions for the country's development. This must be achieved 
by a proper and friendly but at the same time firm and 
consistent foreign policy in which the desire for cooperation 
does not conflict with the country's national interests and 
Russian citizens' sense of national pride. 
  The country is at a historical crossroads. One path leads to 
heedless political confrontation, the breakup of the state, and 
human tragedy; the other leads to constructive accord and 
awareness of the immutable aim, common to all without 
distinction of views or political stance, of strengthening the 
Russian state for the good of its citizens. 
  We all need mutual understanding. It will be found if 
everyone, primarily the president, the Federal Assembly, and the 
government, is able to organize coordinated work. 
  This Russian Federation [RF] president's message marks an 
important step in this direction. The message declares the head 
of state's political course. The president is not encroaching 
on the competence of any federal body of state power. At the 
same time the political, economic, and social guidelines 
contained in the message are a basis for evaluating the activity 
of all state bodies. 
  In accordance with Point "F" of the RF Constitution and 
based 
on: 
  a desire to ensure a more balanced and better-considered 
approach when defining the basic guidelines for domestic and 
foreign policy; 
  the RF president's constitutional duty to ensure the 
coordinated operation and interaction of state bodies, 
  I am sending the RF Federal Assembly my annual message "On 
Strengthening the Russian State (Basic Guidelines for Domestic 
and Foreign Policy)." 

<H5>    1. The Rule-of-Law State </H5>

<H6>    1.1. The Constitution and Legislation </H6>
  The Constitution adopted by national ballot 12 December 1993 
created the preconditions for building a strong state in Russia. 
The new system of state power enshrined by the Constitution 
accords with democratic standards. 
  The formulation of the Constitution took place amid the 
most severe political confrontation. That could not help having 
an impact on the legal quality of some articles. 
  In the new political situation and on the basis of the 
adopted Constitution the continuation of stage-by-stage 
constitutional reform is a justified and lawful process. But it 
is at the same time important to act without haste, not to give 
in to the transitory political situation, and to take into 
consideration the practical experience that will be accumulated 
in implementing the provisions of the Constitution as society 
develops. 
  The important stage of Russia's transformation into a 
democratic state is now coming to a close. A democratic system 
of power is being shaped on the basis of the Constitution. 
  The institution of the presidency, whose powers are designed 
to strengthen the state system and defend constitutional values, 
has acquired new political and legal substance. 
  The role and place of the government take new expression in 
the Constitution. It is an autonomous constitutional 
institution, capable of bearing full responsibility for the 
decisions it adopts. At the same time the government acts 
within the framework of the laws and edicts and in accordance 
with the policy of the president. 
  In December 1993 a parliament appeared in Russia -- the 
Federal Assembly. Without developed parliamentarism, 
full-fledged democracy is impossible. 
  The justice system will be renewed and reformed in the very 
near future. Its role hitherto has been far-removed from that 
which the judiciary should play in a rule-of-law state. 
  The Constitution created a favorable basis for the 
interaction of all branches of power, primarily the president 
and the parliament. However, the Constitution only defines the 
legal conditions for the joint work of the president and the 
Federal Assembly. A desirable psychological climate for mutual 
relations is also essential. That is political culture. 
  Annual presidential messages are one element in this. The 
message is not a directive, but nor is it a collection of good 
intentions. The president possesses sufficient constitutional 
potential to influence the state of affairs. A parliament 
respecting the president's powers will not put up artificial 
barriers to the implementation of the Basic Guidelines for 
Domestic and Foreign Policy. That is the accord which the 
people expect from the authorities. It is on this that the 
strengthening of our state and civil peace in the country 
primarily depend. 
  The stability of society, the defense of its basic values, 
primarily human rights, and the safeguarding of Russia's 
national interests in many respects depend on how effectively 
the democratic power works, whether it is able to overcome the 
gulf between constitutional principles and real practice. 
  One of the reasons for this gulf is that a deep struggle is 
still under way in society and the state apparatus between the 
supporters and opponents of a democratic system. A clash of 
interests is characteristic of any free society. But it is 
fruitful as long as it is conducted within a system of 
democratic values. 
  That is a necessary restriction, and it must be the 
criterion 
for the legal assessment of any politician, any political 
organization, any state institution. In particular, we cannot 
in the future permit the activity of parties, movements, or 
other associations that encroach on the foundations of the 
constitutional system or advocate and sow social, ethnic, and 
religious enmity and hatred. Likewise, such anticonstitutional 
manifestations cannot be permitted under cover of a deputy's 
status or a state post. 
  Disregard by the authorities of infringements of the 
constitutional system means either an inability or a reluctance 
to defend democracy by means of state coercion even though this 
be directly dictated by the Constitution. 
  Another fundamental reason for the gulf between democratic 
principles and state practice is that, having renounced the 
command principle of exercising power, the state has not been 
able to fully master the rule-of-law principle. This has 
elicited such threatening phenomena as: 
  -- an uncontrolled increase in managerial personnel in all 
spheres, which reduces the effectiveness of authority and 
distorts the whole system of government; 
  -- flourishing bureaucracy, which is stifling the growth of 
new economic relations, distorting the state's social policy, 
and having an oppressive effect on people's social state; 
  -- the involvement of officials at various levels of 
government in the political struggle -- which causes state 
decisions to be sabotaged; 
  -- corruption, which has infiltrated the state and municipal 
apparatus; 
  -- a dangerously low level of executive [ispolnitelskaya] 
discipline; 
  -- lack of coordination in the work of ministries, 
departments, and other state bodies. 
  It must be openly admitted that democratic principles of 
organizing power are increasingly being discredited. A negative 
image is developing of democracy as a weak, amorphous authority 
that does little for most people and primarily upholds its own 
corporate interests. Russian society has acquired freedom but 
has not yet perceived democracy as a system of strong state 
power which is at the same time wholly accountable to the people. 
  It is therefore essential during the new stage to create and 
fine-tune the practical mechanisms of democracy. This problem 
can be resolved if we radically boost the effectiveness of state 
power, ensuring precise and unswerving observance of the 
Constitution and the laws, employing if necessary the mandatory 
attribute of authority -- state coercion -- based solely on the 
law. 
  This is a problem of paramount importance, and it must be 
tackled by the joint efforts of the president, the Federal 
Assembly, the government, and other bodies of state power. It 
is necessary in the near future to formulate and adopt laws 
which establish clear rules for the functioning of state bodies, 
primarily executive bodies. They must make provision for 
effective mechanisms of supervision and accountability, making 
it possible to adopt legal acts which are really feasible and 
which thus eschew arbitrary interpretation -- legal acts which 
are economically costed and which incorporate concrete penalties 
for their nonimplementation. These include the laws On the 
Government, On Federal Executive Bodies, On Normative-Legal 
Acts, On Federal State Service, On the Basic Principles of 
Organizing Representative and Executive Bodies of Power in RF 
Components, and On the Status of State Duma Deputies and 
Federation Council Members. 
  It is necessary to revise normative acts at federal, 
regional, and municipal levels with a view to radically reducing 
the sphere of operation of the so-called authorization 
[razreshitelnyy] principle and replacing it with the 
notification [uvedomitelnyy] principle. 
  In the practical activity of executive bodies supervisory 
functions and officials' personal responsibility for failure to 
implement legal acts must be a top priority. The work of state 
bodies and officials must be assessed not only on the results of 
their managerial influence on the situation but also, first and 
foremost, on the standard of their implementation of legal acts 
and decisions of higher-ranking bodies adopted within their 
remit. 
  In a rule-of-law state authority is associated with the law, 
which is a mandatory feature of such a state. Therefore the 
development of the law is a pressing avenue in a policy of 
strengthening the Russian state. 
  The main role in this important matter is played by the 
Federal Assembly. It is necessary to single out the following 
as priorities in legal reform: 
  -- the creation of effective legal mechanisms which 
guarantee 
the rights and freedoms of the individual and the citizen. 
Today the most urgent matters in this sphere are the Housing 
Code, the Code of Labor Laws, the Law on Public Measures, 
changes to the Law On Defense of Consumer Rights, and the Laws 
on State Social Insurance, On the Subsistence Minimum, and On 
Resolving Collective Labor Disputes; 
  -- the development of the legal foundations of a market 
economy (primarily the adoption of a new Civil Code); 
  -- the improvement of procedural, criminal, administrative, 
and other sectors of legislation designed to ensure the rights 
of the individual and of society and to protect them against 
organized crime, corruption, and other criminal manifestations. 
  Those sectors of the law which are just beginning to develop 
or are lacking at present require particular attention. These 
being banking law, law on bills of exchange [vekselnoye pravo], 
tax law, corporate management law, information law, computer 
law, etc. 
  Legal reform must be based on the following principles: 
  -- systemic new legislation (the adoption of packages of 
legislative acts, the exclusion of duplicative acts and legal 
loopholes, etc); 
  -- legal economy (the adoption of fewer normative acts, the 
use of methods of codifying legal acts, etc); 
  -- the unity of the legal system (the establishment of a 
clear hierarchy of legal acts both at federal level and within 
the system of mutual relations with Federation components). 
<H6>  1.2 Judicial Reform </H6>
  If a state has a strong judicial system, then the state 
itself is strong. It is strong because the legislative and 
executive authorities do not expend enormous amounts of effort 
on struggling for the implementation of their respective 
decisions, and they are delivered from the temptation to act by 
illegal means. 
  The judiciary fulfills the main role in defending the law 
everywhere. Its strength is that it is devoid (at any rate it 
should be devoid) of any political interests. Its main and sole 
interest is the law as an independent value. 
  In Russia today judicial institutions are fragmented, their 
jurisdiction does not yet extend to all legal relationships, and 
in many ways the legislative base of justice is obsolete and 
incomplete. 
  The federal authority is thus faced with the pressing task 
of 
deciding how to carry out judicial reform as soon as possible. 
Its objective is the formation of effective justice operating 
on strong legal and democratic principles. 
  Judicial reform should ensure: 
  -- universality of legal protection (the chance of 
protection 
against any manifestations of arbitrariness or violence); 
  -- access to justice; 
  -- prompt legal protection for rights and legitimate 
interests; 
  -- certainty that legal decisions will be implemented. 
  Citizens' legal protection is weak. Many courts do not 
regard constitutional provisions as norms for direct action. 
For various reasons, citizens frequently refuse to exercise 
their right to legal protection. 
  Judicial decisions, primarily in the civil legal sphere, are 
frequently not implemented and are ignored by those to whom they 
are addressed. 
  The principle of the independence of judges and their 
subordination to the law alone has still not become the norm. A 
number of levers that can be used to exert pressure still remain 
in the hands of officials. Judges' working conditions, level of 
social protection, and day-to-day backup depend to a 
considerable extent on how well disposed the local leadership is. 
  The interests of strengthening the state demand reform of 
the 
work of the RF Constitutional Court. Apart from resolving the 
issue of electing more constitutional judges, we also need to 
finalize and adopt a new law on the Constitutional Court as soon 
as possible. At the same time we should also take account of 
the defects of the previous law, which distorted the essential 
nature of this important democratic institution. 
  We need to reform not just the competence of the 
Constitutional Court, not just the guarantees that its decisions 
will be implemented, and not just the status of the judges, but 
also the actual process of constitutional justice. 
  We also need to adopt laws which enshrine these new 
procedural principles in criminal, civil, administrative, and 
arbitration proceedings, primarily the principles of an 
adversarial judicial process and the equality of the two parties. 
  The jury system is one of the most democratic forms of legal 
procedure. The appropriate bodies should therefore summarize 
the results of the experiment begun in 1993 as soon as possible 
and submit proposals for the possible full-scale introduction of 
this institution into legal practice. 
  We need a law on judicial administration which establishes 
general principles for constructing the Russian legal system and 
the particular features of legal regulation of the various 
subsystems of the judiciary. We should also restore progressive 
institutions such as justices of the peace and appeal 
proceedings. 
  A pressing need has developed to isolate administrative 
justice as an autonomous subsystem. It should be composed of 
courts or the judicial offices of general courts with the 
purpose of examining cases relating to the legitimacy of actions 
taken by state and municipal organs and officials. 
  In order to democratically reform the activity of the 
highest 
court within the system of RF general courts, we need a law on 
the RF Supreme Court. 
  In order to create effective justice we need to adopt 
without 
delay a legislative act that establishes guarantees for state 
protection of judges, jurors, witnesses, victims, and other 
participants in the judicial process. 
  Courts need to be fully financed. This is important not just 
in order to lift the prestige of the judiciary but also to 
ensure the courts' full independence of government bodies at all 
levels. 
<H6>  1.3 Protection of the Citizen, the Law, and the State </H6>
  Strengthening the state is inconceivable without curbing 
crime. An enormous difficulty, however, is that a strong state 
is needed in order to combat crime effectively. The problem is 
so acute that it cannot be postponed. We are talking about a 
realistic assessment of the situation and the adoption of all 
possible measures to change it for the better. 
  The unbridled growth of crime is creating a major threat to 
the state and society and to the life, health, and property of 
citizens. Crime currently constitutes a threat to Russia's 
national security. 
  Over the last four years the overall level of crime has 
almost doubled. Dangerous trends in the dynamics and structure 
of crime have been getting stronger. 
  The situation is complicated by the crisis which is also 
being experienced by the law-enforcement organs. Their 
professional cadre nucleus has been significantly weakened. All 
this is having a negative impact on crime detection and the 
prestige of the organs engaged in maintaining law and order, 
which in turn means that lawbreakers go unpunished and the 
criminal world increases its aggression. 
  Recent measures have been taken that are designed to 
concentrate the state's efforts on this important area, and a 
federal program for combating crime in 1994-1995 has been 
prepared. Its objective is to establish additional guarantees 
for the protection of citizens' lives, health, and property and 
other rights, and also to ensure public safety and law and order. 
  The implementation of these planned measures is dependent on 
appropriate financing, which requires the Russian parliament to 
make difficult budget decisions. However difficult the state's 
economic position, we need to do everything we can to satisfy 
the most urgent financial and material requirements of the 
bodies engaged in maintaining law and order. 
  The Ministry of Internal Affairs is to adopt cadre and 
organizational measures to ensure the normal functioning of the 
law-enforcement organs. We need to free them from implementing 
functions and bureaucratic work that are alien to them, and we 
also need to break down departmental barriers and eliminate 
legal and organizational confusion in the activity of the 
law-enforcement organs. 
  We need to form within the structure of the Ministry of 
Internal Affairs a rigidly centralized system of subunits for 
combating organized crime, and first and foremost we need to 
supply these subunits with the best cadres, hardware, and 
financial assistance. 
  The interests of the fight against crime demand the 
implementation of a single legal policy by all bodies and 
officials empowered to carry out criminal prosecutions, be they 
examiners or investigators, prosecutors or judges. 
  We need to ensure social protection for the personnel of 
bodies engaged in maintaining law and order, and at the same 
time we need to strictly monitor how far they measure up to 
professional and moral requirements. 
  The effectiveness of the fight against crime presupposes 
consolidation of the legal base. To this end the Federal 
Assembly must examine and adopt an appropriate package of laws 
as urgently as possible. 
  We need to find legislative solutions to a number of issues 
relating to the fight against organized crime and corruption, 
including: 
  -- reinforcing criminal and other juridical penalties for 
all 
persons involved in organized criminal groups, particularly the 
ringleaders; 
  -- widening the base of evidence; 
  -- protecting those taking part in criminal trials; 
  -- adopting measures to prevent the "laundering" of money 
obtained by illegal methods; 
  -- adopting measures to prevent the emergence of organized 
crime within the state apparatus. 
  These issues must be reflected in federal laws designed to 
combat organized crime and corruption and in the laws on the 
federal state service. 
  We need to eliminate loopholes in the legal regulation of 
the 
fight against economic crime. First and foremost, there should 
be equal legal protection for all forms of property. We need 
acts designed to protect persons engaged in honest business 
activities, and at the same time we need acts on liability for 
dishonest competition and unscrupulous enterprise, false 
bankruptcy, misleading publicity, acquisition of credit by 
deception, violation of tax, customs, and licensing regulations, 
commercial bribery of people in unofficial positions, and 
computer fraud. 
  We need to formulate a fundamentally new system for warning 
us about instances of lawbreaking and neglect among children, 
adolescents, and young people, and we need to set up a network 
of state and social organizations to ensure social protection 
and corrective behavior for this section of the population. 
  We need a raft of measures to offer social assistance to 
people left without a permanent income or the means to survive. 
We need a legislative act that clearly regulates social 
rehabilitation measures for people released from jail. 
  The active integration of domestic crime with the 
international criminal world requires us to strengthen 
cooperation between Russia's law-enforcement organs and those of 
foreign countries. Russian accession to appropriate 
international conventions as soon as possible could serve as the 
legal base for this enlargement. We also need to ratify the 
Convention on Legal Assistance and Legal Relations in Civil, 
Family, and Criminal Cases, signed over two years ago by the CIS 
heads of state in Minsk. 
  The adoption of new Criminal, Criminal Procedure, and 
Criminal Enforcement Codes based on the principle of the 
priority of common human values are a measure that cannot be 
postponed. These codes should reflect the specific 
characteristics of new Russian statehood and stipulate proper 
protection for all its institutions. 
<H5>  2. Man in the Democratic State </H5>
<H6>  2.1. Human Rights </H6>
  The RF Constitution juridically guarantees the state's 
attitude toward human rights in line with contemporary 
perceptions of democracy and the principles of a civil society. 
  Man and his rights and freedoms are a supreme asset. The 
recognition, observance, and protection of human and civil 
rights and freedoms constitute the state's main obligation. 
  Power in a democratic state pursues neither the oppression 
of 
freedom nor external expansion. All its attributes of force are 
needed not for the self-assertion of authority but in order to 
ensure that every person is protected against all types of 
arbitrariness and violence, is conscious of his dignity, and 
plays the part of the state's equal partner. In other words, 
all the state's might must guarantee the safeguarding and 
protection of individuals' rights. 
  The Constitution defines the path which must be followed by 
state bodies. Specifically, it is no longer permissible for 
bodies of state power and local self-government to ignore in 
their practical work the provision that the RF Constitution has 
a direct effect throughout the RF's territory. This makes it 
possible to base judicial decisions directly on the 
Constitution, including cases when current laws are either 
lacking or are at odds with it. 
  The universally recognized principles and norms of 
international law and the RF's international treaties are a 
component of its legal system. Thus, state bodies and officials 
must organize their activity in compliance with international 
standards in the sphere of human rights and the legal protection 
of individuals. 
  But, following the Constitution's adoption, the gap between 
it and the current legislation in the sphere of human rights and 
the protection of individuals widened. Edicts of the RF 
president have partly filled the legal vacuum in question, but 
they cannot and must not constantly replace the laws. Thus, the 
task of bringing legislation in line with the Constitution is on 
the agenda. 
  With a view to normatively guaranteeing human rights, over 
the next two years it will be necessary: 
  -- to elaborate and adopt the laws directly envisaged by the 
Constitution; 
  -- to improve the federal laws currently in force; 
  -- to elaborate and adopt normative acts establishing a 
mechanism for the implementation of federal laws; 
  -- to bring the legal acts of the RF and the Federation 
components in the human rights sphere in line with the Russian 
Constitution. 
<H6>  2.2. The Safety of Individuals </H6>
  A democratic state has no right to invade citizens' private 
lives, but it must guarantee each person's individual safety and 
the protection of his dignity. 
  One of the most acute problems in the life of the state and 
society is the headlong rise in crime. This is one of the main 
factors hindering the implementation of reforms, and is alarming 
citizens as regards their lives and prosperity. The situation 
has become intolerable. Many correct words have been uttered 
about a war against crime. The results are far fewer. It is 
time to get down to specific deeds. 
  The idea that the democratic power is incapable of imposing 
order is being firmly implanted in the public's mind. It is 
necessary to overcome this dangerous misconception. On the 
contrary, people must gain confidence that only the democratic 
state is capable of guaranteeing their safety. 
  The problem of the safety of individuals must be solved 
immediately by applying effective legal, organizational, cadre, 
and financial measures. 
  Russia's citizens also need legal protection against 
arbitrary rule by the state structures themselves. It is 
necessary to create a developed and accessible system of legal 
aid for the population. 
  The level of the legal profession's [advokatura] development 
is an accurate indicator of the legal guarantees of human and 
civil rights and freedoms. It is necessary to legislatively 
guarantee the legal profession's independence and high standing 
and rule out any interference in its activity by bodies of state 
power. At the same time it is necessary to enshrine conditions 
for subsidized provision of various legal services to citizens 
in financial difficulties. 
  It is incumbent on the state to show concern for the 
population's health by recognizing the intrinsic value of the 
health of each one of Russia's citizens. 
  At the same time, the qualitative indicators of the state of 
the population's health have been steadily declining over the 
last 10 years. Demographic processes are developing negatively. 
Life expectancy is declining, the mortality rate is rising. 
There is a growing threat to citizens' sanitary and 
epidemiological safety. Only 60 percent of the population's 
needs for medicines were met in 1993. 
  The government's minimum task in 1994 is to prevent any 
further decline of the volume of medical and medicinal services 
to the population by pooling the various sources of finance and 
concentrating them along the most important avenues of health 
care: accident and emergency medical services, intensive care 
and resuscitation, family medical practice, and provision of 
medicines. 
  The reform of the medical services system is designed to 
stabilize and improve the situation in the health care sphere. 
Its objective is to satisfy the population's needs for 
high-quality and accessible medical and medicinal services and 
to create conditions promoting a healthy, active, and long life. 
  The reform must primarily make provisions for: 
  -- a structural restructuring of the sector and a transition 
to mandatory medical insurance for all citizens of Russia; 
  -- support for the state and municipal health care systems. 
  World experience shows that the introduction of medical 
insurance instead of a centralized health care system is the 
most rational and most reliable form of medical service. Under 
such a system, the patient's interests are protected not only by 
health care bodies but also by the insurance companies. 
  Medical insurance is only just coming into being in Russia. 
Nonetheless, the initial experience of work by territorial funds 
of mandatory medical insurance has shown that the set amount of 
insurance contributions is clearly inadequate and not in a 
position to fully compensate the rising prices of medical and 
medicinal services for the socially unprotected population 
groups. The government will have to find a way to gradually 
raise the insurance contributions. 
  High-quality treatment and preventive medicine are possible 
only on the basis of applying highly efficient medical 
technologies and the achievements of medical, biological, and 
technical sciences which require a modern production base. One 
of the important tasks of federal bodies of power is to promote 
its development by all possible means. It is necessary to 
involve on a large scale the country's enterprises, primarily 
those undergoing conversion, in the production of modern, 
high-quality medicines and medical equipment. 
  It is necessary to retain duty-free centralized imports only 
for vitally important medicines which are not produced in 
Russia. These measures will provide serious support for our 
country's medical industry. 
  The transformations in the health care system require 
legislative backup. In the near future the RF parliament will 
have to examine laws on the health care systems, on patients' 
rights, on medicines, on protection of the family, and a series 
of other laws. 
  For a very long time our country practiced a feckless 
approach toward the creation of new production units and the 
construction of industrial facilities, using predatory methods 
for the utilization of our natural wealth. Nowadays people have 
to pay for these miscalculations. 
  Vast regions in the country have become ecological disaster 
zones. The lives and health of tens of millions of people 
inhabiting these territories, as well as their flora and fauna, 
are under grave threat. A critical situation prevails in a 
series of places, especially in major industrial centers. 
  The public is perfectly justifiably alarmed about the 
condition of the environment and is making fair demands for 
urgent specific work to improve the situation. 
  The citizens' right to enjoy a favorable environment is 
enshrined in the Constitution. Therefore, it is the 
constitutional obligation of all bodies of power to create 
conditions promoting environmental recovery. It is necessary to 
be guided by the principle that ecological safety is a component 
of Russia's national security. 
  The government has elaborated a series of immediate 
ecological programs, but their implementation is progressing 
extremely slowly. The effect of inadequate financing is felt. 
The Federal Assembly and the government will have to give 
serious attention to this problem. 
  The ecological situation in many regions can be repaired by 
federal services exercising ecological monitoring, protecting 
natural resources, and regulating their utilization. For this 
purpose it is important to ensure that their work is not limited 
to just identifying violations and that they make full use of 
all the potential at their disposal. 
  A decisive turnabout in environmental protection work must 
be 
ensured through a long-term state strategy for protection of the 
environment, whose main provisions were ratified in early 
February 1994 by edict of the RF president. 
  Attention in it is focused mainly on: 
  -- guaranteeing ecologically safe and stable development in 
conditions of market relations; 
  -- protecting the environment (including alleviating the 
critical ecological situation in major cities and industrial 
centers and guaranteeing the population's radiation safety); 
  -- ensuring the recovery and restoration of Russia's 
disrupted ecosystems; 
  -- actively participating in the solution of global 
ecological problems. 
  In line with this strategy, the government has been 
instructed to elaborate within two months an action plan for 
environmental protection in 1994-1995. This year the government 
has also been instructed to elaborate a concept of the RF's 
transition to a model of stable development ensuring balanced 
solution of socioeconomic and ecological problems. 
  The complexity and scale of these problem demand 
constructive 
collaboration between federal and regional bodies of power, 
bodies of local self-government, entrepreneurs, and public 
associations. We will need a considered application of both 
economic and administrative regulators within the law's 
framework, developed legal backing, and pursuit of targeted 
socioeconomic, financial, and taxation policies. 
<H6>  2.3. State Support for the Institutions of Civil Society </H6>
  Without a developed civil society, state power will 
inevitably acquire a despotic and totalitarian character. It is 
only thanks to the civil society that this power starts serving 
man and becomes a protector of freedom. 
  It is a specific feature of the Russian situation that the 
foundations of a new democratic state are being laid in parallel 
with the establishment of a civil society. 
  Since a democratic state cannot exist without a civil 
society, the state is objectively interested in supporting 
public institutions. This does not mean the state interfering 
in the life of civil structures or vesting state authority 
powers in public associations; it means selectively helping 
those civil society institutions which are capable of directly 
boosting the democratic potential of authority. 
  The mass media have an invaluable role to play in shaping 
the 
civil society. The protection of their freedom is a strategic 
task. While this freedom exists, democracy is defended by one 
of the most important protective factors. 
  The Russian mass media today are undergoing major 
qualitative 
changes associated with their transition to market tracks. 
Numerous problems have accumulated. Just as in the last two 
years, finances remain a key issue. Under no circumstances 
should the press be left without subsidies in 1994. 
  It is necessary to gradually undertake the destatization of 
the mass media, primarily of newspapers and journals. The state 
authorities must hand their functions as founders over to 
editorial offices and journalists' collectives. 
  It is clear that the state will be unable to cope with the 
financial maintenance of television and radio broadcasting 
companies. The package of presidential edicts on television and 
radio broadcasting issued in December last year defined the 
course of state policy in this sphere. It is important, 
however, to ensure that Russia's information area is not broken 
up and fragmented in the process of implementing practical 
steps. The state television and radio channel must be retained. 
  The time has finally come to develop the legislative base of 
mass media activities. A law on the right of access to 
information must come first in this sphere. It is also 
necessary to prepare draft laws regulating the activity of 
television and radio broadcasting companies, especially since 
some sound work has already been done in this regard. 
  One of the factors which complicate the formation of a 
democratic political system and a civil society is the weak and 
amorphous nature of parties and public organizations. There is 
the great inertia of interparty and intergroup struggle, in 
which the citizens' interests are relegated to the back burner. 
  The Federal Assembly elections in December 1993 demonstrated 
significant shortcomings in the legislative backup for the 
activity of parties, public associations, and mass media during 
the election campaign. 
  It is necessary to ensure that the next presidential and 
parliamentary elections are held on the basis of new and updated 
laws. It is equally important to define at federal level the 
main provisions of electoral legislation in Federation 
components. 
  A special role will have to be played by the law on 
political 
parties which, in parallel with general democratic provisions, 
must boost the development of a multiparty system. 
  It is important that this law should guarantee: 
  -- the strengthening of the parties' role as main channel of 
political activity associated with the shaping of power; 
  -- the creation of conditions encouraging the consolidation 
of parties and the formation of a stable party system; 
  -- the orientation of party activity toward ascertaining and 
expressing the opinions of different strata of society. 
  It is expedient to ensure that the law on political parties 
and the law on elections are coordinated and complement each 
other. 
  Laws on elections ought to be elaborated on the basis of a 
critical interpretation of the experience of the first 
multiparty elections and the dominant participation of major 
political blocs in the elections. 
  An important avenue of lawmaking should be the procedure for 
using the mass media both during the election campaign and in 
the period between elections. Here we cannot avoid a 
legislative regulation of television and radio airtime allocated 
for election campaigning. In this regard, the provision of free 
airtime by state-owned mass media must become one of the forms 
of state support for the multiparty system. 
  It is expedient to utilize the experience accumulated during 
the last elections. The Information Arbitration Court, now the 
Court of Appeal, must sum up this experience and submit relevant 
proposals to the president. 
  The adoption of separate legislative acts on parties and on 
public organizations (associations) will draw a line between 
political activity as such and the activity of organizations and 
citizens aimed at solving nonpolitical problems. This will 
bring public organizations into the implementation of the 
state's social policy. The state will have to partly finance 
the activity of public associations engaged in resolving 
priority social tasks. This will make it possible to partly ease 
the burden of the state and cut back the state apparatus. A 
considered and legislatively enshrined procedure for the use of 
state funds by public organizations will help to enhance the 
efficiency of their utilization. 
  State support for public organizations must take the 
following forms: 
  -- providing subsidies on a competitive basis; 
  -- giving them the right to utilize state property; 
  -- granting them tax concessions and full or partial 
exemption from payment for services rendered by state-owned 
enterprises. 
  While helping, the state must have the right to monitor the 
utilization of any financial or other resources that have been 
made available. 
  This mechanism must be embodied in laws on public 
organizations (on freedom of association), on trade unions, on 
noncommercial organizations, on charitable foundations and 
charitable activity. 
  One of the signs of a developed civil society is the system 
of institutions of self-government. These institutions make it 
possible to impart a constructive meaning to people's free 
activity and link it with self-responsibility. 
  This is precisely why the Constitution singles out a 
separate 
sphere of civic autonomy and activeness -- local self-government 
-- and lays down that bodies of local self-government are not 
part of the system of state power but function autonomously and 
are accountable to their population. 
  But this does not mean that the state can completely 
distance 
itself from legally regulating the structure, functions, and 
powers of local self-government. It is impossible to ignore the 
fact that this is not only a sphere for residents' 
self-organization but also a specific level of power. 
<H5>  3. Federalism -- a Territorial Form of Democracy </H5>
<H6>  3.1. The Integrity of the State and Regional Policy </H6>
  Strengthening the state means above all the strengthening of 
its territorial integrity. The problem does not boil down 
merely to ensuring the inviolability of state borders and 
protecting the country from external threats. For all the 
importance of these tasks, what causes alarm are manifestations 
of the country's disintegration, and internal tendencies which 
threaten its territorial integrity. 
  These misgivings are caused by the fact that the radical 
transformations in the economic and political spheres have 
coincided with the crisis of unitarism which has outlived its 
time. For Russia, which has begun democratic transformations, 
the only real method of strengthening Russia is the creation of 
a modern federative state. 
  The task of the federal authorities is to find the kind of 
form of state structure such that the regions' natural desire 
for greater autonomy does not create a threat to the integrity 
of Russia. 
  The first steps along this path have already been taken. The 
Constitution itself has been prepared with the direct 
participation of the components of the Federation. During the 
Constitutional Conference many contradictions were successfully 
eliminated and it proved possible to find juridical formulas by 
way of a compromise which have become the basis for further 
progression forward. 
  The regions are actively arranging coordinating and 
managerial links with each other. A mechanism of 
"self-attunement" has begun to function thanks to which new 
socio-economic complexes, undivided by administrative 
boundaries, are beginning to take shape in Russia. Prototypes 
of interregional structures of management have appeared and 
these have taken over a proportion of the functions which 
previously used to be fulfilled by the unitary center. These 
are interregional associations whose activity encompasses the 
entire Russian Federation. 
  The growth of the regions' autonomy and the reduction of the 
powers of federal authority do not signify a weakening of the 
state and do not create a threat to the country's unity. The 
constitution lays down the basis principles which guarantee: 
  -- the immutability of the state's territorial integrity; 
  -- the equality of the rights enjoyed by the members of the 
federation between themselves and with respect to the federal 
organs of state power; 
  the unity of the foundations of the state system (observance 
by each region of such fundamental principles of statehood as 
sovereignty of the people, separation of powers, multiplicity of 
parties, and equal electoral rights of citizens). 
  -- freedom of movement for people, for the dissemination of 
information, and for the movement of goods and money throughout 
the state's territory (internal administrative boundaries cannot 
be transformed into state or economic borders); 
  -- the supremacy of federal legislation; 
  -- the impermissibility of actions directed at the 
unilateral 
change of status of a component of the Federation. 
  Like all the other articles of the federal Constitution, 
these principles are mandatory for implementation by the 
authorities and citizens in any region of Russia. In everything 
which does not conflict with these principles and which does not 
fall within the competence of the Russia Federation, the regions 
have freedom in regard to their own development. 
  The time of the struggle of the regions with the "center" 
for 
their rights is receding into history. The Constitution has 
granted all regions of Russia broad rights. Those regional 
politicians who are still demanding powers are breaking through 
a brick wall right next to an open door. The chief problem is 
to proceed to the real assimilation of these rights as soon as 
possible. 
  The broad handover of powers to regional authorities does 
not 
in any way mean that the federal authorities are withdrawing 
from the exercise of any influence whatsoever on the regional 
life of Russian society. On the contrary, under the new 
conditions there is a growing need for the development and 
implementation of the Russian state's new regional strategy. 
  This task was set by the president back in April last year 
although its implementation was rendered difficult until after 
the constitutional crisis was overcome. 
  The basic principles and aims of regional strategy consist 
in 
the following: 
  -- overcoming sharp differences between regions in terms of 
the standard of living and levels of development; 
  -- the development of interregional cooperation and the 
maximal use of the potential deriving from the regions' 
diversity; 
  -- the use of methods of incentive and regulation and the 
renunciation of administration by injunction; 
  -- the prosperity of citizens; 
  -- the transition from narrowly economic toward broader -- 
societal and social -- goals; 
  -- ensuring territorial fairness (no region must acquire any 
unjustified privileges). 
  An important instrument for perfecting the fundamentals of 
federalism must be a law on the general principles of organizing 
the representative and executive organs of state power in the 
components of the Federation. 
  In the political sphere direct elections of regional 
authorities are the guarantee for regional autonomy. Regional 
authorities must be subordinated not to the federal authorities 
but to the federal Constitution. 
  The division of sources of taxation receipts among federal, 
regional, and local levels must become a guartantee for the 
economic autonomy of the regions. Then each level of state 
power will be really independent from the others. Citizens and 
enterprises can function as tax-payers. 
  Ensuring the rights of local self-government is one of the 
most important conditions for preserving territorial integrity. 
The competence of its organs encompasses the satisfaction of 
the most crucial, everyday, vitally essential needs of the 
people which neither federal, nor regional authorities are able 
to provide. 
  Local self-government has deep historical roots in Russian 
political culture, taking the form of the zemstvo. For the 
young Russian democracy local self-government can become an 
effective means of galvanizing citizens and a means of involving 
them in constructive political work which yields real practical 
results. 
  It is precisely at the level of local self-government that 
various forms of the national-cultural developoment of the 
peoples of Russia can acquire pratical embodiment.. 
  Federal power is faced with a very important task -- to 
strictly delimit the functions, rights, duties, and 
responsibility between the organs of state power and local 
self-government. At the same time their material and financial 
sources have to be divided. For this purpose it is essential to 
adopt a federal law on the general principles of organizing 
local self-government. Taking this as a base, the organs of 
power of the components of the Federation must adopt legal acts 
regulating the structure and powers of the organs of local 
self-government in their own regions taking account of national 
and local traditions. 
  The president, the Federal Assembly, the Government, and 
the components of the Federation must participate in drawing up 
and implementing regional policy. Possibilities now exist for 
legislative and executive authorities to exercise a proper 
influence in this sphere. The appearance of the Federation 
Council -- the first "chamber of the regions" in Russia's 
history -- will help substantially to raise the standard of 
discussion of regional problems. This chamber has a big part to 
play in developing laws connected with resolving a whole range 
of the country's regional problems. Committes for Federation 
affairs and regional policy have been set up in both the 
Federation Council and in the State Duma. 
  During the development of genuine federalism new problems 
will surely crop up and we have to be prepared to solve them. 
One of them is the possible growth of contradictions between 
the regions. Such contradictions existed before but they were 
resolved by administrative means from Moscow. But now, by an 
large, it will be the regions themseves which will have to 
overcome these contradictions. When an impasse is encountered 
the president will use conciliatory procedures and set up 
conference commissions to resolve disagreements between the 
organs of state power of the Russian Federation and the organs 
of state power of its components, and likewise between the 
organs of state power of the federation's components themselves. 
  Treaties between the federal authority and the subjects of 
the Federation concerning the demarcation of areas of 
responsibility and powers operate as a most important mechanism 
for the self-attunement of federative relations. A treaty of 
this type has been signed with the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  The regulation of relations between the federal authority 
and 
the Chechen Republic represents a special problem. The holding 
of free democratic elections in Chechnya and talks on the 
demarcation of powers with the federal authorities could become 
a basis for this. 
  An immediate task is to draw up and adopt basic laws which 
will make it possible to convey the constitutional principles of 
the new federative relations into the real pratice of the 
application of the law. The following laws are necessary: 
  -- on the principles of the demarcation of areas of 
responsibility and the mutual delegation of powers between the 
federal "center" and the components of the Federation; 
  -- on the procedure for the admission to the Russian 
Federation of a new compnent or for the formation of a new 
component within its composition; 
  -- on the procedure for changing the constitutional-legal 
status of a component of the Russian Federation. 
<H6>  3.2. Russia's Economic Unity </H6>
  The divergent starting conditions and nonidentical economic 
policies of local authorities are intensifying the divergences 
between different regions, thus forming the potential for the 
disintegration of Russia. It is intolerable that, when coming 
into conflict with the Constitution, the authorities of the 
regions: 
  -- limit the freedom of economic, scientific, technical, amd 
other contractual relationships between enterprisers of 
different components of the Federation; 
  -- create obstacles to the movement of goods, financial 
resources, and to the movement of people across administrative 
boundaries of territories; 
  -- violate the unity of the principles of taxation. 
  Each region of the Federation is entitled to apply its own 
tactical methods when implementing the strategic tasks of 
economic reform. But no region has the right to use these 
methods in such a way that in fact they would cancel out the 
common goals, separate it from the Federation, and would inflict 
direct or indirect harm on other regions. The unity of the 
Federation's economic space is inviolable. 
  In order to strengthen it, it is essential to ensure the 
priority development of a unified infrastructure (energy, 
transportation, communications, information science), and to 
provide for rigorous sanctions against regions which impede the 
transfer of taxes to the federal budget or fail to discharge 
other obligations to the federal organs. 
  The federal authorities, finally, must take exhaustive steps 
to complete the process of the demarcation of state property 
both between the Federation's components themselves and also 
between the federal "center" and the regions. Russia's 
government should within a very tight timeframe make an 
inventory of the legal arrangements for the management of 
federal property located on the territory of the components of 
the Russian Federation, and of its material condition. 
  The concessions which have been granted to certain regions, 
some of which are economically inexpedient or simply unfair in 
relation to the country's citizens living in other territories, 
ought to be revisited. A system is necessary based on unified 
criteria for granting concessions with regard to federal taxes 
and credits. It is essential to render support to enterprises 
working in accordance with federal programs and create 
incentives for the development of Russian interregional 
corporations. It is essential to ensure the unconditional 
fulfillment of the Constitution by sweeping away any regional 
barriers in the way of the movement of goods, money, and 
services. 
  Regions cannot be the subjects of economic relations. Their 
authorities are not entitled to supplant the true subjects -- 
the citizens and enterprises -- merely because they are located 
on a territory which is administratively subordinate to the 
regional authorities. 
  At the same time it cannot be allowed that the struggle 
against economic separatism should infringe the rights of the 
Federation's regions or should lead to the restoration of a 
unitary state. The course toward the handover to them of an 
increasingly large volume of powers must continue. 
  Federal authority will undertake support for economically 
depressed regions through the Federal Regional Development Fund. 
The main source of money for the support of the weak must be the 
territorial rent which is emerging in a number of regions on the 
strength of more favorable natural and geographic factors, and 
also as a consequence of former preferential state capital 
investments. 
  While ensuring the minimum necessary level of support for 
the 
systems of education and health care and for the institutions of 
the labor market, the federal authorities must not limit the 
autonomy of the regions in the choice of their own system of 
social support for the population adapted to local conditions. 
  It is very important that the efforts of the federal organs 
of power should be supplemented by energetic and all-around 
activity by the components of the Federation. The general path 
for state influence on regional development is not to make 
direct transfers of money from the federal budget to the 
regional budget but to use these resources in joint programs on 
a parity basis. The development of small and medium cities, 
highway construction and so forth ought, for example, to be 
approached from this angle. The program for the development of 
small and medium cities that is with the government ought to be 
examined, taking this into account. 
  A big role must be played by the territorial organs of 
federal executive power envisioned by the constitution. It is 
they that will shoulder the main burden in devising and 
implementing federal and interregional programs for the 
territories. Support will be needed for interregional 
associations operating for the purposes of economic integration. 
It is a question of the comprehensive utilization and 
protection of natural resources, regional programs and their 
financing on a shared basis. 
<H6>  3.3. Federalism and Interethnic Accord </H6>
  The strengthening of the Russian state is unthinkable 
without 
accord among the peoples inhabiting it. 
  A multitude of national problems has been engendered by the 
contradictory nature of two principles which, right from the 
beginning, were made the basis of the Russian Federation's state 
structure: the national-territorial principle and the 
administrative-territorial principle. This is being manifested 
clearly today when the redistribution of the functions and 
powers of the authorities between the federal organs and 
components of the federation is taking place. Under present 
conditions the historical necessity for their coexistence 
persists. At the same time the contradictions between them will 
be smoothed out on the basis of a new concept, enshrined in the 
Constitution, of the nation as a community of citizens 
[sograzhdanstvo]. 
  The Constitution proclaims the self-determination of the 
Russian Federation on behalf of all its multiethnic people as 
the vehicle of the sovereignty and single source of authority in 
the state; and likewise the source of authority in the 
republics, krays and oblasts is their entire population 
regardless of nationality. The division of inhabitants into 
representatives of so-called "indigenous" and "nonindigenous" 
nationalities is unconstitutional and therefore inadmissible. 
  The equality of rights and freedoms of all citizens 
regardless of their nationality, as provided for in the 
Constitution, must be strictly guaranteed. No ethnic group may 
possess an exclusive right of control over territory, 
institutions of power, and resources. The equality of rights 
calls for the necessity to adopt coordinated decisions which 
take account of the interests of the various national groups. 
  The integrity of the state is based to a significant degree 
on maintaining the unity of the civic society and the 
preservation of the diversity of its ethnic components. This is 
why a democratic nationalities policy is vitally necessary. It 
must be aimed at solving the following most urgent issues: 
  -- nationalities problems when building the federal state; 
  -- the defense of citizens' rights and of the ehtnic, 
religious, and linguistic communities which they make up; 
  -- the enthno-cultural development of the peoples of the 
Russian Federation; 
  -- the prevention and settlement of interethnic conflicts. 
  Above all the state is obliged to create conditions enabling 
the representatives of various nationalities to independently 
determine and implement their own social and cultural objectives 
and to form associations, unions, and other institutions of a 
civic society. In the economy this means above all the freedom 
of enterprise and equal rights of property for the citizens of 
all nationalities. In politics it means maintaining the 
national groups' diverse forms of self-government. 
  The self-organization of ethnic communities which do not 
have 
their own national-territorial entities on the territory of the 
Russian Federation or which live outside the boundaries of such 
entities is possible in various forms of national-cultural 
autonomy. The legal foundations of their activity is to be 
determined by the government and Federal Assembly. 
  The Federal, republic-regional, and local authorities are 
obliged to defend human rights in the ethnic sphere and give 
preferential support to the least protected ethnic groups. It 
is the state's task to preserve vulnerable ethnic cultures and 
communities, especially in the regions of the European North, 
Siberia, and the Far East. The pursuit of economic reforms in 
these regions must be accompanied by a package of measures to 
defend the rights of numerically small peoples, including: 
  -- budget financing of traditional sectors of the economy 
and 
social sphere; 
  -- the development of the social infrastructure of national 
settlements and the development of special forms of medical 
services and education taking into account the specific features 
of the way of life of numerically small peoples of the North; 
  -- the preservation of language, culture, and traditional 
habitat. 
  Priority state support is also essential for all ethnic 
categories of refugees and enforced exiles from zones of 
interethnic conflicts. Such problems are especially acute in 
the North Caucasus. 
  This year will see the 50th anniversary of a tragic event -- 
the forced resettlement of many peoples of Russia from their 
native localities. Overcoming the consequences of a repressive 
nationalities policy is one of the priority tasks of organs of 
power at all levels. Interethnic accord, readiness for 
dialogue, and a quest for compromise are especially important in 
solving these very complex problems. 
  The preservation and strentghening of the federative state 
depends directly on the national self-awareness of the Russians. 
In Russia Russians constitute the absolute majority of the 
peoplation -- 83 percent. They are not threatened by 
assimilation, a tendency to forget their mother tongue, or by 
the loss of their national originality. 
  At the same time it is impossible to deny the existence of a 
number of problems which are being encountered by Russians 
especially in certain republics of the Federation and in regions 
bordering on zones of interethnic conflicts. The same basic 
principles of a democratic nationalities policy are being 
applied in their regard, to wit: 
  -- national parity with other peoples on the territory of 
all 
components of the Federation, and in particular equality in the 
use of one's mother tongue in official relations and in social 
and cultural life; 
  -- the right to ethnocultural self-organization; for 
example, 
by setting up regional-cultural associations on territories 
where Russians are in the minority; 
  -- state support for programs for the revival of the 
regional 
diversity of Russian national culture and, of course, for 
Russian settlers. The state will strive to accept all migrant 
fellow countrymen and to give priority help in accommodating and 
finding job placements for socially unprotected groups of 
migrants and also for those of them who are headed for regions 
whose development is of special significance for the country. 
  In Russia the Federal authorities have displayed sufficient 
reserve and prudence which have made it possible to avoid a 
situation whereby constitutional conflicts with a number of 
republics might develop into interethnic confrontation. The 
organs of state power have still to devise a concept of state 
policy for Russia for averting and settling interethnic 
conflicts. It must be based on the principle of the primacy of 
peaceful political means of resolving contradictions that crop 
up. At the same time the state is obliged to use all legitimate 
means, including force, to immediately localize armed clashes, 
to disarm illegal military formations, and to nip in the bud the 
activities of organizations and persons preaching ethnic strife 
and calling for violence. 
  On the whole the policy of interethnic accord must occupy 
one 
of the leading places in the state strategy for the development 
of the Russian Federation. In order to implement this policy 
the following package of draft laws needs to be elaborated: 
  -- on national minorities; 
  -- on the status of national councils, rayons, okrugs, and 
settlements and on national-cultural autonomy; 
  -- on the development of ethnic cultures and languages; 
  -- on forced migration and refugees from zones of 
interethnic 
conflicts. 
<H5>  4. Toward A Social State Through Market Reform. </H5>
<H6>  4.1. Reform Reserves </H6>
  The economy of the transition period is always unstable. If 
a state is weak, instability grows, reform grinds to a halt, and 
economic activity is destroyed. In a strong state, 
stabilization is achieved more quickly, and reform creates the 
preconditions for economic revival. Unless the state is 
strengthened, Russia will find it impossible to overcome the 
crisis and implement a profound reform of the economy. 
  Right now, the situation in the economy is highly alarming. 
Mutual nonpayments are bringing enterprises to a halt. Prices 
continue to rise. In January 1994 the rate of inflation rose 
again to hit 22 percent. People have not been paid for months. 
Social tension remains high. 
  In August 1993 the government adopted an action program, 
which it is trying to carry out. The authorities of many 
regions, now in possession of sufficient freedom to effect 
market transformations in which millions of people are taking 
part, are taking vigorous action. However, the economic 
situation is not improving. An analysis of what is happening is 
required. 
  Real economic reform in Russia was inevitable. Any deviation 
from the strategy of reform will place the country on the brink 
of catastrophe. The state's political line must be 
single-minded: There will be no turning back. 
  The reform is intended to transform the economic mechanism 
in 
a radical manner, to render it efficient, and to make it work to 
people's advantage. Now, two years on from its beginning, it is 
possible to sum up the results, to compare the gains and the 
losses, and to define the reserves. 
  The reform can be credited with the dismantling of the basic 
elements of an outmoded administrative system, and the switch to 
economic methods of regulation. The first stage of 
privatization, without which reform would have been impossible, 
is drawing to a close. Within a short space of time private 
ownership, almost wholly eradicated in past decades, has once 
again became a reality. 
  There is evidence of changes in the economic psychology, the 
gradual adjustment of producers and consumers to market 
conditions. Economic activity, prices, and foreign trade have 
been liberalized. Business activity is moving from the state to 
the nonstate sector. A consumer market has started to function. 
  Russia has a sizable foreign trade surplus. For the first 
time in many years grain imports have dropped significantly. 
There has been success in achieving the domestic convertibility 
of the ruble for current transactions, and in creating specific 
currency reserves allowing us to maintain vital imports and the 
minimum required payments against the foreign debt. Gradually, 
Russia is becoming integrated into the world economy. 
  The results observed are considerable if compared with the 
situation on the eve of reform. They have been achieved 
primarily through the efforts of the millions of people who have 
accepted reform. Despite all the difficulties of the first 
years of market reforms, people do not want to return to the old 
ways. 
  The results are modest if you think of what might have been, 
given normal political conditions and without major errors on 
the part of the authorities. 
  The reform of the economic mechanism is far from over. Its 
reserves are significant, and they must be utilized in full in 
1994: 
  -- the institutions of a market economy; 
  -- a system of state management; 
  -- demonopolization; 
  -- taxation; 
  -- economic legislation. 
  Upon completion of the check stage of privatization, a 
qualitatively new stage of this process will begin. An increase 
in investment activity, a weighty contribution to the structural 
overhaul, the creation of a competitive milieu, and the 
formation of a full-fledged stock market will become the central 
problems. 
  Although Russia already has the bases of a market economy 
infrastructure, this infrastructure is distributed highly 
unevenly. In particular, the country does not have effective 
institutions guaranteeing the operation of markets for 
equipment, land, accommodations and other immovable assets, 
securities, and wholesale trade. The Federal Government and the 
regional authorities have no right to be indifferent to this. 
What is more, the institutional aspect of the reform must 
become the vanguard. 
  The Federal Assembly will be acting correctly if it lays a 
firm legal base for Russian enterprise. The main thing is that 
it should be stable. The bodies of state power need to simplify 
considerably the procedures regulating private business 
activity. The complexity and inconsistency of regulation hinders 
the development of enterprise and nurtures corruption. 
Preferential state support is required by those entrepreneurial 
structures which are operating in priority areas of the reform. 
The Federal Program of State Support for Small Enterprise is to 
guarantee this in 1994. 
  The most pressing tasks for 1994 include the formation of a 
modern system of accounting and the start of the far-reaching 
reform of the Central Bank with the aim of creating a Russian 
Federal Reserve System. Given that the actions of the Central 
Bank have key significance for the fate of the reform and wide 
sociopolitical consequences, the process of reforming it will be 
under the president's control. 
  The year 1994 must become the year of the formation of 
Russian financial-industrial groups. It is for the government 
to monitor that they are set up on a strictly voluntary basis, 
and to guard against the resurrection of the old ministerial 
structures, the misappropriation of state property, and 
unjustified monopoly. Such institutions are capable of 
maintaining a sufficient level of investment activity and 
technological innovations, and of ensuring the concentration of 
resources in areas of growth and the necessary competitiveness 
both on the domestic Russian market and on the world market. 
  The alternative is only too clear: The rapid suffocation of 
Russian entrepreneurial structures by the foreign 
multinationals, with the exception, perhaps, of those operating 
in the raw material sector. It is necessary to set in place 
without delay institutions guaranteeing the implementation of 
state structural policy. 
  In the agrarian sector it is time for the government and the 
regional authorities to set up mechanisms to realize the right 
of private land ownership, and to help construct a modern 
banking infrastructure. A rational protectionist policy is 
required, protecting the interests of national producers but 
without perceptible damage to consumers. 
  In 1994 it is necessary to begin a radical alteration of the 
entire system of state support for the agrarian sector. This 
does not mean meeting any financial requests from the sector, 
but instead a real reform of its economic mechanism -- this must 
be the main principle. 
  The state has as yet failed to bring about the effective 
regulation of the economy, in particular the management of 
enterprises belonging to it. 
  Owing to this, many enterprises to this day do not bear full 
liability for the results of their activity, hoping to get 
support from the budget even in the event of continuing with 
clearly inefficient production. Everybody knows where this kind 
of support leads -- to new spirals of inflation, the slowing of 
the structural overhaul, and a drop in economic efficiency. It 
is precisely for this reason that reform is not progressing as 
quickly as it might at the level of state enterprises. 
  In place of the old links of the administrative system, new 
administrative structures have emerged and strengthened, many of 
which are by no means obligatory in market conditions. Although 
a bureaucrat no longer doles out plans and allocates funds, he 
is no less powerful insofar as he distributes centralized 
credits and investments, allocates export quotas, and issues 
licenses. As a consequence of this, not only is management 
efficiency lost but the economic base of corruption is 
reproduced. 
  The government has been unable to impose the requisite 
order here. The de facto nonownership of property and the 
management "vacuum" in the state sector must be eradicated in 
1994. Serious changes in legislation are overdue: the norms 
prescribed for an economy of centralized planning and economic 
accountability are now inappropriate. The state's attitude 
toward its own enterprises must be that of a proprietor. This 
will stop the squandering of state property to the advantage of 
the mercenary interests of certain economic managers, increase 
the efficiency of its utilization, and, by shedding nonviable 
production facilities, maintain the viable ones. 
  The creation of a regulatory system for the market econmy is 
not a retreat but a move forward, a development of the reform, a 
strengthening of the Russian state. In a badly managed economy 
there will never be true market-based order. 
  As before, its formation is hindered by loss-making 
monopolism. So deeply have monopoly structures taken root in the 
Russian economy that demonopolization will take some 
considerable time. The task in the coming years is to reform the 
monopolized economy -- this circumstance has to be taken fully 
into account. 
  In order to make rational use of the antimonopoly reserve of 
the reform it is necessary to broaden the appropriate 
legislation and to demand greater accountability from the state 
bodies implementing it. The formation of a competitive medium 
will be aided by measures stimulating private enterprise and the 
formation of multiprofile companies, and by a well-balanced 
foreign trade policy protecting the economic interests of 
Russia, not by inefficient monopolist formations. 
  The effective transformation of the tax system will help 
economic reform along considerably. It should be clear and 
stable, at least, for the duration a year. The number of taxes 
should be reduced, and the procedure for levying them should be 
considerably simplified. The changes to the taxation system 
must support the producers, particularly those working in the 
consumer market; they should also stimulate investment and prove 
highly effective for the economy as a whole. 
  We should also think hard about bringing into play 
mechanisms 
that will make it impossible and disadvantageous to evade taxes. 
Massive attempts to conceal income from taxation are more 
intolerable. In the final analysis we must learn to collect 
everything that is due to the state. The budget will feel the 
benefits of such a policy immediately, and the budget deficit 
problem will become less acute. This is especially important 
inasmuch as it is becoming ever more difficult to resolve this 
problem by cutting expenditure. 
  The government should put forward legislative initiatives 
that envisage shifting the center of gravity onto taxation of 
natural resources and real estate. We need to tighten up 
financial penalties for those who pollute the environment, 
without, however, undermining the competitiveness of Russian 
output on the world market. The substantial consolidation of 
tax breaks for capital investment and innovative activity is in 
the interests of production. 
  We urgently need to make a breakthrough in the sphere of 
legal backup for market reform. Economic legislation lacks 
unity. Hitherto it has proved impossible to fully regulate legal 
relationships between the Federal Government and the regional 
authorities. The competence of state bodies at one level has 
not been demarcated. 
  Draft laws slated for submission to the Russian president 
and 
State Duma in 1994 include the RF Civil Code, which includes a 
general and a specific section. Its adoption would create an 
all-embracing legal basis for a market economy, a society of 
civilized property owners, economic freedom for the individual, 
and partnership relations between the citizen and the state. 
The Civil Code embodies new principles of entrepreneurship, 
relationships between economic players, and other key reform 
issues. 
  Draft codes on housing, labor law, joint-stock company law, 
and contractual partnership are being prepared. The same goes 
for taxation and agrarian legislation, and for changes and 
supplements to laws on bankruptcy, competition, limitations on 
monopoly activity, and the peasant (private farmer) economy. Of 
extreme importance are legislative acts regulating the 
circulation of securities, foreign investment, concessions, and 
the functioning of free economic zones. A new law on the 
banking system is also needed. 
<H6>  4.2. The Price of Reform and Ways of Reducing It </H6>
  Economic reform is not painless and free of charge. Losses 
are inevitable, and the central political problem is to ensure 
that the cost of market transformations is not too great for 
society. We have not managed to achieve this. 
  The high cost of reform is explained, first, by the 
unfavorable starting position. At the end of 1991 the economy 
was in an extremely grave state. The effective abandonment of 
the totalitarian system's mechanism coincided with the USSR's 
disintegration and the severing of economic ties. The consumer 
market was devastated even earlier, foreign currency reserves 
were exhausted. The production slump deepened. The ruble was 
washed out of circulation and barter flourished. By postponing 
necessary reforms for decades the totalitarian regime 
exacerbated all problems to the utmost and exhausted the 
national economy's durability margin. 
  Russia inherited from the past a cumbersome production 
structure dominated by the military-industrial complex and 
monopolism, and exports geared to raw materials. 
  Inflation began much earlier than 1992. This disease ravaged 
our economy for many years, taking the form of a universal 
commodity shortage, distribution by ration coupon, and waiting 
lines kilometers long. When price liberalization was launched, 
inflationary energy that had been pent up for years burst out. 
  Second, the price of reform is determined by political 
circumstances. Two years of reform in Russia were accompanied 
by a most acute confrontation between the branches of federal 
power during which they weakened each other, and that means the 
state as a whole. The transfer of the struggle to the sphere of 
economic policy had very grave consequences for the country and 
especially for reform: weak legislative support for market 
transformations, delays in reform, accelerated inflation -- this 
is by no means a full list. 
  Third, the downside of the reform was attributable to 
mistakes by the bodies of state power responsible for reform. 
The government took poor account of the consequences of some 
decisions, postponed the adoption of others, was slow to make 
considreed corrections to reform, and underused the reform's 
reserves. This was especially noticeable in recent months, when 
the government not so much advanced the reform as reacted to the 
problems arising. The pause in reformation became protracted. 
It is time to end it. 
  The experience of the past two years shows that it is not 
only the reform itself that is turning into the well-known 
losses. Even greater harm is being done by delaying overdue 
amendments to the structure of the economic mechanism. 
  One of the main ingredients of the cost of Russian reform is 
persistently high inflation, the endless rise in prices. This 
is inflicting enormous damage on the reform itself, the 
poulation's quality of life, and the economy as a whole. In 
conditions of unrestrained inflation the crisis is 
insurmountable. 
  The capital investment situation remains extremely grave. 
The basis of the investment crisis is high inflation, as a 
result of which money is going not into production but into 
brokerage. There is practically no more budget investment, 
there is still no share market -- such is the inevitable 
combination of the transition period, the negative consequences 
of which for investment are perfectly clear. Because of 
inflation credit has become not only expensive but also 
primarily short-term. Consequently the future of Russia's 
economy is under threat. 
  The inertia of the economic slump persists. In a number of 
sectors the real degradation and destruction of production is 
under way, with a fall in output in 1993 by 25 percent and more. 
  High-technology machine building is in a very difficult 
situation. Some plants are surviving only by switching to 
production of technologically obsolete equipment, slipping to 
the level of the sixties. Although we are producing less than 
before, consumption of raw materials, fuel, and energy remains 
considerable. Efficiency is falling. The reality of the 
transitional period is that Russian industry could become a 
market industry, but one that is primitive and inefficient. 
Such a payment for market reform would be inordinately high. 
  In two years of reform the government has simply been unable 
to elaborate an effective structural policy. This inaction will 
cost the Russian economy dear. 
  Production is being greatly harmed by the crisis of mutual 
nonpayments. Not only the economy but also the social sphere is 
suffering, because hidden unemployment is increasing, wages are 
not being paid on time, and local budgets are failing to collect 
a considerable proportion of taxes. If we delay a solution to 
the problem, massive nonpayments will continue to promote the 
closure of enterprises and intensify the production slump. 
  The social cost of reform proved to be very great indeed. On 
the one hand the reforms cannot be allowed to founder, which 
will merely intensify the difficulties being experienced by the 
people. On the other hand the threshold of social shock must not 
be exceeded. Otherwise the population's willingness to support 
market reform will come into sharp conflict with the fear of 
being crushed by it. The greatest fears are caused by poverty, 
glaring inequality, and unemployment. 
  The country is suffering losses because of weak control over 
the export of resources and unfavorable foreign trade 
conditions. The general economic instability and deficiencies 
in foreign currency control are having the effect of leaving a 
considerable proportion of export earnings sitting in Russian 
enterprise accounts abroad. The state is obliged to reliably 
protect national interests. Otherwise citizens' confidence in 
any of its actions, including reformatory actions, is undermined. 
  The cost of reform has proved to be high. The trajectory was 
correct but the flight was accompanied by serious mistakes. Not 
only the Russian economic mechanism remained largely 
expenditure-driven. Likewise the political mechanism. 
  The failings of the reform and its reserves are clear. The 
most important task now is to make market transformations less 
onerous for society without reducing the pace of reform -- and 
even increasing it. 
  Despite the fact that the rate of price increases is high, 
there are possibilities of restraining inflation. A monthly 
inflation level of 3-5 percent by the end of 1994 specified in 
the Government Program should serve as a guideline. If it is 
possible to reach this line and sustain it and make price 
dynamics predictable, according to current Russian standards 
such inflation could be considered acceptable. 
  The aim is achievable only given joint constructive work 
between the Federal Assembly and government. Other 
prerequisites are: coordinated actions between the Finance 
Ministry and Central Bank in the sphere of credit policy, 
scrapping wasteful subsidies and support for unprofitable 
production facilities, cutting the budget deficit and setting 
its maximum size every quarter, swiching to deficit financing by 
placing the state's debt commitments in domestic and foreign 
financial institutions, and only granting credits to CIS 
countries which are secured on property and other assets. 
  The slowing of the rise in prices will be assisted by a 
considered pricing policy in those sectors where monopolism is a 
natural characteristic and is attributable to the specific 
features of production, for example in electric power 
engineering and railroad transport. 
  The prices race cannot be halted without a consistently 
anti-inflationary monetary and financial policy. But the 
government must also use other anti-inflationary levers, 
specifically any reserves in structural investment and taxation 
policies, and the mechanisms of social partnership. 
  Any economic policy actions of the federal authorities must 
be tested for inflation safety. The maximum permissible level 
of inflation must not be exceeded. This requirement must be 
strictly observed. Otherwise intervention from the president 
right up to the use of his constitutional powers cannot be ruled 
out. 
  The government will not find it easy to fulfill this 
requirement. Especially now, when it is faced with clearing 
debts to the defense sector, the agro-industrial complex, and 
budget-funded institutions, and repay debts to northerners. But 
if the government requires others to observe financial 
discipline then it must start doing so itself. Commitments 
assumed must be met. And greater responsibility must be shown 
in the future. 
  Another serious problem is the setting in motion of 
mechanisms which make it possible to overcome the nonpayments 
crisis and to stop the closure of viable enterprises. It cannot 
be ruled out that, relying on the law, it will be necessary to 
take tough administrative measures against leaders of state 
enterprises who, while having funds available in accounts, 
refuse to pay suppliers and demand money from federal 
authorities. The nonpayments crisis is taking on a political 
hue and is becoming a threat to the country's national security. 
The president's actions will be commensurate with the situation. 
  The lack of real action by the government and Central Bank 
on 
the problem of enterprises' mutual indebtedness is more 
inadmissible. We must introduce the elaborated scheme for 
clearing the state's debts to commodity producers and implement 
other planned measures. Let us hope they operate effectively 
and help break the chain of mutual nonpayments without fueling 
inflation. In 1994 we must start to register debts in the form 
of securities, to reorganize and revitalize economically 
insolvent enterprises, and in some cases to apply the bankruptcy 
procedure. This is especially necessary because, the government 
believes, the stabilization of the investment process can be 
expected this year. 
  It is essential to halt the technological regression of 
Russian industry, to prevent this process becoming irreversible, 
above all in sectors which are highly competitive in the world 
market -- the aerospace, laser, and atomic industries, 
shipbuilding, space services, and those devising software 
programs. The government should clariy the prospects for the 
defense order and meet the financial commitments it has assumed 
without delay. The carefully conceived conversion of the 
defense complex is no less important. There are also other 
priorities, which are contained in the Government Program 
adopted 6 August 1993. 
  If market forces alone are relied on, the solution of 
structural problems will be something for the distant future, an 
extremely expensive process associated with considerable 
expenditure on restoring what has been lost. An effective 
structural policy will help to reduce the costs of reform. The 
government must establish a uniform procedure for the granting 
of state support and strict control over how it is used. The 
distribution of centralized investment resources should be 
carried out on a competitive basis. The distribution of benefits 
on an individual basis must be kept to a minimum and regulated. 
This applies to both industry and agriculture. 
  Under the Constitution, Russia is a social state. Therefore 
Russian citizens must be confident that the legislative and 
executive branches will exercise control of the observance of 
the individual's basic social rights. I am referring to the 
length of the working day, a guaranteed minimum income, the 
situation of the unemployed, protection for mothers and 
children, prohibiting the use of child labor, housing provision, 
the right to a vacation, etc. What is needed is a firm 
legislative base which specifies the state's duties and 
responsibility to citizens and the mechanisms for their 
implementation. 
  Ensuring the requisite level of social protection will 
become an immutable requirement made of government economic 
policy. Only a state program which does not cause an 
intolerable reduction in basic social indicators must be adopted 
for implementation. If the government is incapable of ensuring 
compliance with the social rights of citizens enshrined in the 
Constitution, it means it is not working skillfully enough. The 
population's legitimate interests will be protected by the 
authority given to the president by the Constitution. 
  The state's efforts should be concentrated on the following 
main areas. 
  -- stabilization of the population's living standard; 
  -- broadening of incentives for labor and entrepreneurial 
activity by economically active citizens; 
  -- targeted support for the least protected social strata; 
  -- a more equal sharing of the burden of the economic crisis 
among various groups of the population. 
  It must be recognized that there is an urgent need for a 
package of documents relating to the social protection of the 
population, which will be based on the Law on the Subsistence 
Minimum and other enactments of the Federal Assembly. Every 
citizen of Russia must be ensured the necessary minimum level of 
goods and services. And this should form the basis for 
determining the level of the minimum wage, pensions, grants, and 
allowances. A unified system of social guarantees will thereby 
be built. 
  Support for the needy, an effective income tax, and actions 
by the state to speed up the structural improvement 
[strukturizatsiya] of the consumer market, a review of 
concessions for certain enterprises and regions, and, needless 
to say, a reduction in inflation will be needed to reduce 
unwarranted differences in real incomes. 
  Comprehensive reform of the system of social services is 
needed, making provision for social guarantees for the needy, 
along with the introduction of charges [platnost]. A switch to 
a two-tier system of pension provision is needed, whereby state 
pensions will be supplemented with payments from citizens' 
individual accounts in pension funds accumulating personal 
savings. 
  It is necessary to create financial reserves in good time, 
using them to fully provision federal, regional, and other 
employment funds. The proper amount of unemployment benefit and 
other payments linked with the loss of jobs must be issued, and 
without delay. In 1994 employment policy will have to be 
considerably stepped up. Urgent economic measures may also be 
necessary in areas where the level of unemployment exceeds 
socially tolerable limits. 
  The government must continue to provide gradual compensation 
for private savings wiped out by price liberalization. 
Mechanisms are needed to curb and delay the effects of 
inflation. The task must be performed not just because in early 
1992 most holders of savings did not have the slightest chance 
of rescuing them from depreciation. The problem goes deeper 
than that, affecting the authorities' prestige and the degree of 
government and parliamentary responsibility for their 
predecessors' social pledges. 
  The state and society cannot do without social partnership 
institutions which enable tasks to be performed on a national 
scale. This may include, for instance, the regular coordination 
of the positions of the government, entrepreneurs, and trade 
unions within the framework of a tripartite commission. 
  The federal unification of foreign trade procedures, the 
abolition of unwarranted concessions for regions, sectors, and 
certain enterprises, and a move to the sale by tender of export 
quotas will help reduce the cost of reform. It is necessary to 
continue the policy of liberalizing exports as well as 
tightening up state control of exports of strategically 
important raw material and energy resources. A targeted state 
program providing incentives for science-intensive commercial 
exports will be needed. 
  The government must step up currency control. Tough 
penalties are needed for offenders who illegally stash hard 
currency resources abroad. At the same time private holders of 
hard currency must be given state guarantees to protect them 
against having these assets confiscated or frozen. 
  Russia will escape from the crisis and continue reform 
autonomously and develop economic relations with other states 
and international financial organizations on the basis of 
equality and national interests. The Federal Assembly and the 
government have much to do to ensure that investment in the 
Russian economy becomes more appealing to foreign firms. At the 
same time it is clear that the latter will refrain from major 
investment until stabilization is established and until Russian 
entrepreneurs start investing capital in the Russian economy. 
The Russian state must consistently uphold the interests of 
Russian companies on the domestic and world markets. 
  Thus, in present conditions economic policy must be 
structured in such a way as to ensure that two strategic 
objectives are met, to whit: 
  -- continuing reform and changing the actual structure of 
the 
economic system; 
  -- reducing the cost of reform, i.e. combating inflation, 
structural crisis, poverty, unjust inequality, and enforced 
unemployment. 
  In 1994 there will be tough sociopolitical restrictions and 
little freedom for maneuver. It is all the more necessary for 
the state bodies responsible for economic policy to pool their 
efforts. These must be concentrated on the main task -- the 
reform of the economic mechanism. 
  Reform will gain a second wind if we energetically implement 
urgent institutional transformations, start a qualitatively new 
phase of privatization, lay the foundations for an effective 
system of state regulation, use the available reserves of 
demonopolization, reform taxation, adopt vitally necessary 
legislative acts, and provide the mechanisms for their 
implementation. It will then be possible with the help of a 
well-considered economic policy to steer the Russian economy 
between hyperinflation and a drastic decline in production, 
avoiding both, and render market transformations less 
cost-based. There is no other way to restore the economy than by 
continuing reform. 
  Russian state bodies must do everything to ensure that 1994 
is the year that sees the rate of inflation gradually drop, the 
fall in production diminish and come to a halt, vigorous 
structural transformations based on the removal of inefficient 
production units and support for points of growth, and the 
stabilization of living standards for the bulk of the 
population. This year the preconditions may be created not only 
for economic stabilization but also for the start of steady 
economic growth. 
  Only a professional and responsible Federal Assembly and 
government can do this. That is precisely what the country 
expects of them. 
<H5>  5. From a Monopoly Ideology to Cultural Diversity </H5>
<H6>  5.1 Development of Culture, Science, and Education </H6>
  Russia's wealth lies in its unique spiritual and 
intellectual 
potential. At the most difficult points in our history, our 
inexhaustible reserve of spiritual strength has saved our 
country and allowed it to withstand and overcome inconceivable 
obstacles. 
  But today problems in the cultural sphere are being felt 
more 
and more keenly. The totalitarian state ideology, whose 
mouthpiece was the CPSU and which held sway for decades, has 
collapsed. 
  It has been replaced by the realization of a natural 
historical and cultural continuity; an understanding of the 
realities of the modern world and Russia's place in it; the 
value of the individual and his dignity; an effort to bring the 
state into line with human nature; and the restoration of 
natural proportion with regard to society and the individual. 
But these improvements signaling a return to spiritual health 
have still not been transformed into a system of social and 
cultural standards. 
  The result of all this is that there has been a loss of 
moral 
reference points. This is manifested in: 
  -- a loss of interest in questions of principle concerning 
our life in society overall, and in particular among the 
intelligentsia; 
  -- an undermining of people's moral foundations, a 
dehumanization of life and culture, and an increase in extremism 
in literally all spheres of social activity -- from economics to 
culture; 
  -- the destruction of a core world view, a readiness to 
believe in any random illusion, any speculative idea, and at the 
same time in nihilism and absolute nonbelief. 
  All these trends are alarming, and the Russian State's main 
task is to overcome them. If this is not done it will not be 
possible to regenerate the country or the Russian people's 
dignity. 
  It is time to recognize that culture cannot survive without 
the state's taking an active part in its future. During the 
whole of Russia's thousand-year history, culture and people 
working in the cultural sphere have not enjoyed so much creative 
freedom and political independence as today. But it is at this 
very moment that the problems of the "country becoming 
culturally impoverished," the "destruction of talent," and 
poverty among writers, artists, scientists, and museum and 
library staffs have reared their ugly heads. Creative people 
are becoming hostages to commercialization. Culture and art are 
beginning to lose their old role in public life. 
  The vital issue for 1994 is the establishment of the best 
possible relations between the state and culture. The extreme 
positions which should be avoided at all costs are well known: 
  -- freedom in itself is no guarantee whatsoever of 
flourishing creative activity; 
  -- if cultural activities are even in part maintained under 
duress, they will sooner or later grind to a halt. Creativity 
and coercion are incompatible. No directives coming from above 
will genuinely be able to improve culture. 
  Russia has a vital need for a national cultural policy. It 
is not a question of the relevant ministry or ministries having 
a program of measures or of the Federation components having a 
certain set of plans of action for culture. Cultural diversity 
never fitted into any framework laid down by government 
departments or into the administrative-territorial organization 
of the country's activities. 
  The state should propose federal programs for preserving and 
developing national culture and stimulating its diversity. 
  Our opportunities are limited in the context of the economic 
crisis. But the budgetary obligations which the state is taking 
on should be carried out. Society should know what proportion 
of the budget will be spent on culture, science, education, and 
public health. 
  One task for the future is to go over in practice to a 
multichannel system of financing culture. The federal and 
regional authorities and the organs of local self-government 
should bear its costs. Charity may provide significant backing 
for culture, especially if the government is finally able to 
stimulate this by tax incentives. A law on charitable funds and 
charitable activities is necessary for this. 
  Our immediate tasks include developing a legal base for 
culture, in particular providing a legislative definition of the 
legal status of cultural organizations. And preparing a draft 
law on noncommercial organizations. Its adoption will permit us 
to put the resolution of many acute social and cultural problems 
on a strict legal basis. 
  In the context of privatization and the transition to new 
land relations, a task for the authorities at all levels is the 
conservation of historical and cultural monuments, historical 
complexes, reserves, archives, museums, and libraries. The 
cultural heritage is a special kind of state property which 
requires special regulation. 
  It is necessary to elaborate and adopt laws protecting the 
cultural heritage of the Russian Federation's peoples and 
museums and their collections and to take the specific nature of 
culture into consideration in general laws. This affects first 
and foremost tax legislation, in which it is necessary to switch 
to a comprehensive system for supporting culture, people 
involved in culture, and their professional associations. 
  It is necessary to make appropriate changes to the Criminal 
Code, the Code of Penal Procedure, and the Code of 
Administrative Violations, making provision for stiffer 
penalties for crime against the country's cultural heritage. 
  Strengthening Russia's statehood is inconceivable without 
science's development, the sense of which is absolutely clear 
now: There has to be a natural integration of science and the 
new market conditions. 
  It is a question of creating the conditions for introducing 
academic developmental work of an applied nature, of carrying 
out various types of scientific and scientific-technical work 
and services to help execute major projects. 
  It is essential in 1994 to pay particular attention to the 
fate of the so-called science cities like Arzamas-16. Having at 
their disposal a unique scientific and technical potential, they 
can become centers for generating new knowledge, technology, and 
modern education, conduits for innovative technology to all 
areas of the national economy, a basis for developing state 
scientific centers and the conversion of industrial plants. 
  The Russian Federation's system of scientific research 
institutes was created over many years through the work and 
talent of many generations of Russians and as a whole is very 
advanced. In a number of areas of knowledge, particularly 
technology, our science is falling behind world standards, but 
to a much smaller degree than in other spheres (agriculture and 
industry). 
  However, changes are required in the forms of scientific 
management which developed in the context of the unitary state. 
They cannot be transferred to market conditions in their 
previous form. The basic aim of all restructuring in science is 
to create favorable conditions for the creative activities of 
primary scientific collectives -- not of institutions and 
departments -- and for free competition among different schools 
and tendencies. 
  The scientific-technical revolution resulted in a serious 
overrating of the relative values of the material and 
intellectual components of the national wealth. It is 
intellect, represented among other things by the high technology 
of the technotron age, which is a decisive source of rapid 
industrial and agricultural growth. Without the development of 
fundamental scientific research as a matter of priority, this 
decisive source will dry up or will become less active. 
  Fundamental theoretical research in the fields of 
philosophy, 
history, sociology, psychology, and law is needed to bring the 
humanities side of our culture up to a level worthy of the best 
traditions of Russian thought in the humanities and, in the 
present crucial period in Russia's development, to create a 
spiritual and intellectual basis for social change. 
  The state must continue with the budget financing of 
fundamental research and fundamentally new technologies. 
Permanent state support for the universally recognized 
fundamental scientific research center -- the Russian Academy of 
Sciences (understood as a system of scientific institutes) -- is 
also required. 
  It is important to adopt a law on science and 
scientific-technical policy. It is also necessary to elaborate 
legal measures which would make it possible to expand the inflow 
of funds from republic and other regional budgets for the 
financing of projects being carried out in the interests of 
republics and regions. 
  Legislative acts on scientific research organization, on 
scientific and technical expertise, and a number of other topics 
must also be prepared. 
  A regime of full public information is necessary in terms of 
the volumes and deadlines for the allocation and distribution of 
state budget funds at all levels, and also full and open 
accountability for all expenditure. Budget financing should be 
supplemented by competitive financing, which, in the face of a 
deficit of resources, will promise the most effective use of 
funds. 
  While not underestimating the significance of broad 
international cooperation, all the necessary conditions 
(earnings, equipment, libraries) must be created for our 
scientists to be able to work efficiently in their own homeland. 
  The situation in colleges and universities is no less 
difficult. Young teachers are leaving Russian institutes of 
higher education, the prestige of this profession is falling, 
and the socioeconomic position of scientific-pedagogical and 
research cadres has deteriorated sharply. 
  Resolute steps to ensure more effective use of both the 
educational and the scientific potential of colleges and 
universities must be taken in 1994-1995 and not put off until 
the future, and the existing forms, as well as the integration 
of science and higher education, must be expanded. This applies 
to fundamentally new forms of mutual relations between science 
and institutes of higher education -- the creation of scientific 
education complexes and the preparation of joint scientific 
programs, projects, and text books for schools and institutes of 
higher education. 
  The Russian higher education system must be given greater 
stability. Regional scientific educational programs must be 
funded on an equal basis from the state budget and territorial 
budgets. The active participation of local budgets in resolving 
questions of the development of the material base and the social 
protection of students and workers in higher education is 
required. 
  Spiritual and intellectual perfection will not appear on its 
own. The reform of our society must presuppose the fundamental 
reform of the education system, starting with the aims of 
education, its economic foundation, and the running of the 
education system, and ending with the system of training and 
retraining specialists, the structure of schools, and the 
content and technology of education. 
  The development of a modern society urgently and 
increasingly 
requires independence of thought and the ability to make 
decisions. The modern mass school is not geared to forming 
these individual qualities. 
  Solving educational problems is impossible without improving 
the running of the education system. The following must be 
singled out especially: 
  -- the implementation of a federal program for the 
development of education; 
  -- the demarcation of the competence of educational 
administration bodies at various levels; 
  -- the transition to state-public forms of administration; 
  -- the use of flexible mechanisms of administration, 
envisaging the attestation of workers in education and 
educational institutions and the licensing of educational 
activity. 
  A very important step has already been taken -- the Law on 
Education has been adopted. This law has unfettered the school 
and de-ideologized it. But it is precisely in schools, more 
than in any other sector of industry, science, or culture, that 
we are not yet ready for freedom and creative work. 
  The centralized financing of the schools from the state 
budget has become an objective obstacle to their development. 
Obviously, even now some of the expenditure must be borne by 
the state budget. This primarily means capital construction. 
The other part should be covered by municipal funds. Russia 
does have experience of doing this. The practice must be 
revived in the law on local self-government. An enormous role 
in the funding of schools can be played by local educational 
funds and school boards of trustees if a sensible taxation 
concession system is drawn up. 
  Fundamental changes are also necessary in running the 
education system. So far this work has been carried out by the 
actual administration workers in their own interests. The 
overall number of administrative workers per student has 
increased continuously. The new education system must be geared 
to the child, a more comfortable life for him, and his optimum 
development. 
  Federal laws must be elaborated and adopted on: 
  -- high school education; 
  -- college and university education; 
  -- further professional education; 
  -- the privatization of state and municipal educational 
institutions. 
<H6>  5.2. Inter-Religion and Multiconfessional Dialogue in a 
Secular State </H6>
  Russia is a state with a variety of religions; dialogue 
among 
them is one of Russia's traditions. Russia's history shows us 
experience of this dialogue, conducted both by religious figures 
and through contacts among believers from different religious 
groups. 
  The experience of neighborly coexistence, mutual 
understanding, and mutual assistance among communities and 
spiritual centers of different religions and faiths is 
particularly important for us today. The experience of Russian 
state policy, developing as it does in a multiethnic, diverse 
religious environment, is equally important. 
  For over 70 years Russian society lived in conditions of 
effective state atheism. However, the age-old people's 
principles were not totally destroyed. The revival of interest 
in religion is a fact of modern life. Consideration of this 
factor in the activity of state bodies and the maintenance of 
interreligious peace in the country are an abiding value and a 
long-term task. 
  The actual rather than merely verbal renunciation of the 
policy of state atheism; religious dialogue; and proper 
relations between Russia's churches and religious associations 
is one of the conditions for civic peace and general 
conciliation in society. 
  The legislative and executive authorities must do everything 
to preclude the very possibility of ethnopolitical conflicts 
developing into interreligious conflicts especially since, 
strictly speaking, none of Russia's peoples is entirely uniform 
in religious terms. 
  State bodies at all levels must rigorously observe the 
adopted norms, which are designed to ensure genuine freedom of 
conscience in Russia, restore the justice with regard to 
Russia's churches and religious associations that was violated 
during the postrevolutionary period, and help normalize their 
traditional activity. At the same time it must be borne in mind 
that the church is separate from the state but not from society, 
with which it historically is closely interconnected. Special 
attention must be paid to the legal and property status of 
churches and religious associations, their centers, parishes, 
monasteries, spiritual education establishments, and other 
establishments. 
<H5>  6. Russia and Security in the World </H5>
<H6>  6.1. Military Security </H6>
  One of the most important aspects of strengthening the state 
system is to ensure the military security of the Russian 
Federation. 
  The RF Armed Forces and other troops are designed to: 
  -- defend the sovereignty, territorial integrity and other 
vital interests of the RF in the event of aggression against it 
or its allies; 
  -- suppress armed conflict threatening Russia's vital 
interests and any illegal armed violence within Russia, on its 
State Border, or on the borders of other states in accordance 
with treaty commitments; 
  -- conduct peacekeeping operations by decision of the UN 
Security Council or in accordance with the RF's international 
commitments. 
  In view of the changes in the geopolitical situation a 
tremendous amount of work has been carried out on the 
organizational development of the Armed Forces: Combat strength 
has been determined, new groups of troops (forces) have been 
created, mobile forces are being formed, strategic, operational, 
and mobilization planning for the use of the Armed Forces has 
been completed, and the number of fully manned, combat-ready 
units and combined formations has been increased. 
  As a result the RF Armed Forces are combat capable and by 
and 
large fulfill their assigned tasks. The main attention should 
subsequently be geared to military-legal reform, continued 
organizational development of the Armed Forces, and their 
in-depth reform. 
  The fundamental principles of legal support for the Russian 
Army have already been created; however, some of the provisions 
are not in force owing to the lack of a mechanism to implement 
them and the lack of sources of funding. Amendments and addenda 
must be made to military legislation. 
  Basic Provisions of Military Doctrine have been adopted for 
the first time in Russia's history as a normative-legal act, 
establishing the main guidelines for the development of the 
Armed Forces and other troops in the military-political, 
military, and military-technical spheres respectively. 
  The adopted military doctrine effectively represents the 
concept for military security -- an integral part of the unified 
concept for Russia's national security. Military organizational 
development must be conducted in strict accordance with the 
Basic Provisions of RF Military Doctrine. Around 20 new draft 
laws will also have to be prepared and examined. 
  On the basis of constitutional principles it is necessary to 
step up legal protection for Armed Forces servicemen and 
civilian personnel, military command and control organs, and 
troop units. 
  Effective interaction among the appropriate structures of 
the 
Federal Assembly, ministries, and departments must be ensured in 
the interests of implementing military-legal reform. 
  The formation of the Armed Forces in line with the new 
conditions must be completed in full in the period 1994-1995 and 
a base created for their in-depth transformation. 
  In view of the special features of the RF's geopolitical 
position, reform of the Armed Forces is based on the principle 
of mobile defense -- the creation of relatively small but 
relatively powerful forces, ready for immediate use in areas 
where a real threat to Russia's security arises. 
  The strategic nuclear forces will continue to be the main 
means of deterrence against war being unleashed. 
  Experimental-design work will be vigorously developed in 
military-technical policy, making it possible to provide a 
suitable response to existing and potential military threats and 
military-technical breakthroughs [proryvy]. The tasks of 
ensuring the country's nuclear security and equipping the Army 
and Navy with state-of-the-art combat command and control, 
communications, reconnaissance, and radioelectronic warfare 
systems are regarded as being of paramount importance. 
  The Program for Military Organizational Development is to be 
implemented in the immediate future. It is advisable to 
formulate and adopt a package of normative-legal acts defining 
the procedure for the implementation of military organizational 
development as a whole. 
  In 1994 the withdrawal of troops back to Russian territory 
is 
to be completed in the main. This task is being performed in a 
systematic manner, taking the real situation into consideration. 
The troop withdrawal is, however, still considerably 
outstripping the pace of structural development for servicemen. 
It is necessary to ensure the rigorous implementation of the 
State Housing Program for Servicemen and Their Families. The 
government is assigned the main supervisory and organizational 
functions here. 
  The planned reduction in manpower is being carried out. 
However, the manning problem remains one of the bottlenecks in 
military organizational development. It can only be resolved 
over the next few years by employing the mixed method of manning 
(by contract and draft). 
  The reorganization of and force reductions in the Armed 
Forces are making it possible to change the structure of the 
military budget considerably and confer on it a greater social 
thrust. 
  One of the most important tasks on the state scale is to 
ensure the prestige of service in Russia's Armed Forces. A 
person in military uniform must be perceived as the guarantor of 
security, stability, and order in the country. 
  Strengthening the Armed Forces is an important task for all 
branches of power. Its resolution will require people to rise 
above party bias and standpoint and unite all the wholesome 
forces in society. Nor can the components of the Federation 
remain aloof from this work. 
<H6>  6.2. Russia Within the System of International Relations </H6>
  The strengthening of the state system is an essential 
condition if Russia is to occupy a proper place within the 
system of changed international relations. 
  The generally recognized principles and norms of 
international law form the basis of our foreign policy course. 
Russia respects the sovereignty, territorial integrity, and 
independence of other states, including, naturally, those of our 
neighbors, and demands the same of them. Within the framework 
of these universal principles we will protect our legitimate 
interests and, if need be, will do so with firmness and 
toughness. Any self-respecting state does likewise, 
particularly when the protection of human rights and people's 
honor and dignity is involved. 
  The consistent promotion of national interests through 
openness and cooperation and the guaranteeing of favorable 
conditions for internal development and the continuation of 
reforms constitute the main goal of the Russian state's foreign 
policy in 1994. 
  By virtue of its potential and its geopolitical situation 
and 
influence Russia bears special responsibility for maintaining 
stability in the modern, multipolar world -- a complex and 
unpredictable world. Skillful work is needed in squaring 
competing interests and simultaneously promoting our own. 
  Global confrontation has disappeared into the past. For the 
first time in many years Russia has no military adversaries. 
The priorities in the sphere of our country's national security 
are eliminating centers of military conflict on Russia's 
borders, strengthening the arrangements governing the 
nonproliferation of mass destruction weapons and sophisticated 
military technologies, and enhancing control over the 
international arms trade while watching over Russia's commercial 
interests in this sphere. 
  The enactment of the START II Treaty and the Convention on 
the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons is on the agenda. The 
ratification of these documents by the Federal Assembly will 
mark a major stage in the implementation of Russia's new 
military doctrine, particularly as the Agreement between Russia, 
the United States, and Ukraine on the Complete Elimination of 
Strategic Nuclear Armaments on Ukrainian Territory has already 
been signed. 
  Relations with the new independent states on Russia's 
borders 
and the all-around development of the CIS are of paramount 
importance in foreign policy in 1994. This is a sphere of 
special responsibility and special mutual interest between 
Russia and its neighbors. Our country is bound up with them 
more closely than is usual with neighbors -- that is a reality 
which must be taken into account if we are to maintain control 
over economic and social processes and guarantee an acceptable 
level of security. 
  In the preceding period we managed to avoid two extremes -- 
imperial attempts to restore the Union state by force, with 
redrawing of the borders, or attempts by Russia to sidestep the 
problems of the former Union. Thanks to this no tragedy 
occurred on the nuclear superpower's territory. However, 
alongside the traditional opportunities which bind our contries 
by invisible threads in all spheres, new problems for Russia 
also lurk here. The centers of conflict close to its borders and 
the protracted crisis of the economy and indeed of the actual 
state system in a number of CIS countries do pose a serious 
threat to our country's security. 
  Practice shows that no one, apart from Russia, is ready 
today 
to assume the burden of peacemaking in the area of the former 
USSR. Nevertheless, the use of Russian peacemaking forces in CIS 
operations has hitherto been regarded with wariness in a number 
of countries. 
  It is essential that this be changed. In all CIS countries 
where Russia is involved in peacemaking operations it is doing 
so at the request and with the agreement of its neighbors, on 
the basis of international legal documents, and in full keeping 
with the sovereign rights of states as enshrined in the UN 
Charter. And that is why it does not need to ask the world 
community each time for authorization for a particular 
operation, although active UN and CSCE assistance in terms of 
personnel and finance would make peacemaking in the CIS more 
effective. 
  The year 1994 must see the start of practical 
implementation of the Treaty on Collective Security and the 
provision of backup for the activity of the CIS Collective 
Security Council. There is an urgent need to set up a Standing 
Consultative Commission on Peacemaking Activity in order to 
develop jointly with our partners practical forms and 
proccedures for cooperation in this sphere. 
  The Federal Assembly should soon examine the draft law on 
the 
participation of Russian military contingents in peacemaking 
operations, including operations within the CIS, CSCE, and UN 
frameworks. 
  Concern for Russians who have found themselves outside the 
bounds of the Russian Federation should invariably be at the 
focus of our attention in all spheres of relations between the 
CIS and the Baltic states. Wherever they live, our compatriots 
should feel themselves to be citizens who enjoy full and equal 
rights. 
  The interests of Russians in the CIS and the Baltic states 
will only be guaranteed if internationally recognized standards 
in the sphere of hunman rights and the rights of national 
minorities are observed throughout the territory of the former 
USSR. 
  A start has been made here. On Russia's initiative the 
Declaration on International Commitments in the Sphere of Human 
Rights and Basic Freedoms has been adopted in the CIS and a 
Commission on Human Rights has been established. 
  The next step is to secure the signing by Commonwealth 
states 
of the Convention on Guaranteeing the Rights of Persons 
Belonging to National, Ethnic, Lingustic, Cultural, and 
Religious Minorities and to submit the draft Commonwealth 
Convention on Human Rights to the Council of CIS Heads of 
States. Its adoption is a sine qua non for the start of 
practical work by the CIS Commission for Human Rights. 
  The elaboration of a Program for the Protection of the 
Interests and for the Support of Ethnic Russians Living Outside 
the Bounds of the Russian Federation is drawing close to 
completion. It is essential that the sources of finance and the 
mechanism for coordination at government level be clearly 
defined. 
  Russia is not entitled to reduce the level of its activity 
in 
the question of guaranteeing the rights of minorities in the CIS 
and Baltic states. Russian representatives should continue 
persistently to raise this problem before international 
institutions and seek their participation in the defense of 
their compatriots. It is also essential to develop such 
cooperation with the CSCE high commissioner for national 
minorities. 
  The formation of the CIS has been accompanied by a host of 
problems new and old. Nevertheless, a trend toward economic 
reintegration and deeper political cooperation has already 
emerged. 
  The organization of joint defense, the joint protection of 
borders, the creation of a single information area, and the 
comprehensive tackling of problems of citizenship and the 
protection of migrants' rights are questions which must figure 
at the center of our attention. 
  The economy is a particularly important sphere of 
cooperation 
between Russia and the newly independent states. The new 
mechanisms of economic collaboration are developing with 
difficulty and at a far slower pace than life requires. 
  There are many disputes over the problem of national 
currencies. The possibility of introducing a single monetary 
system with Russia is under study in a number of states. The 
most active proposals concerning the unification of monetary 
systems are currently coming from the government of the Republic 
of Belarus. 
  The unification of monetary systems is a highly complex 
process. A different level of prices has already taken shape in 
the new independent states. Marked differences in the methods 
of state management of the economy also exist. But all these 
problems can ultimately be resolved. The main difficulty is how 
to structure the management of the monetary system -- the actual 
circulatory system of the economy -- while retaining two 
governments, two national banks, two autonomous budgets, and two 
parliaments with equal and sovereign rights. Another important 
question is the following: What powers should a state entering 
into a unified monetary system with Russia on the basis of the 
Russian ruble voluntarily delegate in so doing; and will it not 
subsequently call for the revocation of those powers with damage 
to the other party? Finally, it is necessary to determine what 
level of political integration will guarantee the viability of 
the re-created unified monetary system. 
  It is clear that unification of the monetary systems could 
be very costly for our country. However, in the future 
unification could not just bring advantages to Belarus but could 
also cover Russia's costs and bring it its own rewards in 
conditions where new political approaches are employed. The 
president and government will seek these political solutions and 
approaches in close cooperation with the Federal Assembly. 
  Life goes on, and, regardless of the monetary basis on which 
settlements among neighboring states are structured, they should 
work toward a single economic area with observance of the 
principle of the free movement of goods, services, capital, and 
manpower. Special attention should be paid here to meeting the 
immediate needs of ordinary people: guaranteeing the 
unrestricted transfer of pensions and wages and the unrestricted 
exchange of currency when traveling. All these painful problems 
demand a well-considered but prompt solution. 
  The president of Russia has been elected chairman of the 
Council of CIS Heads of State for the next six months. This 
opportunity will be utilized to the full to make Russian 
initiatives and step up the work of forming the Economic Union 
-- the Commonwealth's common market. 
  The following items figure on the immediate agenda: 
  -- concluding an agreement creating a multilateral free 
trade 
zone and a customs union and an agreement forming a mechanism 
governing payment and settlement relations and a payments union; 
  -- ensuring the conditions necessary for the creation of the 
production and trade infrastructure of a common market 
(transnational associations and corporations, industrial and 
financial associations, brokerage firms, insurance companies, 
and joint banking structures); 
  -- preparing agreements providing for the solution of the 
most acute social problems, incuding those regulating the 
processes of migration, ensuring maximum freedom of movement of 
the population across the new borders, and providing joint 
measures for their social protection; 
  -- creating an Interstate Cooperation Committee in which 
Commonwealth member-states would vest a number of regulatory and 
control functions, particularly as regards the fulfillment of 
agreements. 
  In accordance with the decision of the Ashgabat meeting, 
Russia has proposed to the United Nations that the CIS be 
granted observer status as an international regional 
organization in the UN General Assembly. It is essential to 
speed up the preparation of proposals on permanent links between 
the CIS and the CSCE and other organizations. This will not 
only strengthen the Commonwealth's general authority in the 
world but will also enhance the quality of its collaboration 
with the world community in ensuring security and stability. 
  Strengthening the United Nations and adopting a model for 
reforming the organization which would transform it into the 
most reliable and all-embracing institution of international 
cooperation are priorities for Russia's multilateral diplomacy. 
  Partnership has become a key feature of Russia's relations 
with other states. The new nature of ties with the West opens 
up favorable opportunities for more effective realization of 
Russia's interests in the sphere of security, the economy, 
trade, and business. 
  Russia has joined the main international economic 
organizations. The next step is the energetic establishment of 
proper collaboration with them. 
  Since the G-7 meeting in Tokyo Russian diplomats and 
financiers have begun participating in conferences of its 
experts. A G-7 mission has been set up in Moscow. But an 
effective mechanism for consultation with the West, particularly 
as regards consideration of Russian interests, has not yet been 
set up. This is causing increasingly appreciable harm not just 
to Russia but to our partners too. 
  We have the opportunity today to achieve a qualitatively new 
level of cooperation between Russia and the G-7. The basic 
guidelines of the strategy of Russia's cooperation with the G-7 
-- in both the economic and foreign policy spheres -- could be 
confirmed at the meeting in Naples. This strategy should 
clearly delineate the long-term plan for turning the G-7 into a 
G-8, starting with the sphere of politics. 
  The elimination of COCOM this spring will be the final step 
in removing restrictions on Russian foreign trade links. The 
new international arrangements for controlling the trade in 
military and dual-purpose technology demands the direct 
involvement of Russia and the United States as major arms 
producers. 
  It is essential to make full use of the new opportunities 
for 
Russia-U.S. cooperation in the political, economic, scientific, 
technical, and other sectors. 
  Participation in building a greater Europe that is peaceful, 
unified, and democratic is one of Russia's main tasks in the 
European area. The next meeting of CSCE members in Budapest will 
be a landmark event in that direction. 
  Russia has proposed and will contine to uphold its concept 
of 
pan-European partnership. The CSCE is required to be the main 
instrument in the political building of the new Europe, while in 
the military-political sphere the North Atlantic Cooperation 
Council must play that role. It could coordinate the work of 
the regional organizations -- NATO, the WEU, and the CIS -- in 
maintaining peace and stability in the European area and 
ensuring greater openness in military activity and in the sphere 
of the conversion of the military-industrial complex. Other 
elements of the concept include granting the countries of 
Central Europe cross guarantees by Russia and its West European 
partners and expanding the North Atlantic Cooperation Council by 
including the neutral states of Europe. 
  Russia advocates a qualitative and quantitative approach to 
the problems of European security. We respect the sovereign 
right of states to enter into any alliances and the sovereign 
right of alliances to admit them. But our neighbors in Europe 
should also know our opinion: We are opposed to an expansion of 
NATO without Russia. On the basis of this principle, Russia 
supports the Partnership for Peace program as a means of 
pan-European partnership that is open to all states of the 
greater Europe. 
  The practical study of the parameters of the agreement with 
NATO must be speeded up so that we not only do not lag behind 
other countries but are out in front, especially in establishing 
cooperation in the military sphere. 
  Major bilateral documents have been signed with the majority 
of West European states. The task now is to fill the accords 
with the real content of practical collaboration while 
continuing regular top-level dialogue. It is essential to 
complete the preparation of the agreement on partnership and 
cooperation with the European Union. 
  Stepping up efforts to form new relations with the states of 
Central and East Europe is an important area of Russian military 
policy in 1994. Experience shows that common interests in 
carrying out democratic and market reforms and traditional links 
among our peoples outweigh old grievances. 
  Russia intends to continue to play one of the leading roles 
in seeking a settlement of the crisis in former Yugsolavia. The 
main thing here is to mobilize the political efforts of the 
world community to end the war in Bosnia and, as a first step, 
to consolidate safe areas, including in Sarajevo. In any event 
it must be clear that the Bosnian conflict cannot be resolved by 
selective support or punishment for one side or other. All 
sides must be persistently encouraged toward peace. The United 
Nations and its Security Council have a special role here. 
  Taking account of the FRY's fulfillment of the UN demands 
for 
a settlement of the Bosnia conflict, Russia will seek the 
dropping of the sanctions against that country. 
  Russia's mutual relations with the world are determined by 
its unique Eurasian status. In 1994 it is necessary to make use 
of the new opportunities for the development of cooperation with 
leading Asian states -- India, China, and Japan -- and with new 
partners -- South Korea and the ASEAN and Persian Gulf countries. 
  The current level of mutual relations with China and the 
transformation of that country into one of Russia's main trading 
partners makes it possible to set the task of moving our 
relations to the stage of constructive partnership on bilateral 
and international political issues. 
  Japan holds a special place in Far East politics. Russia 
intends to consistently work toward the conclusion of a peace 
treaty with that country on the basis of respect for each 
other's positions, the finding of mutually acceptable formulas, 
and the resolution of all contradictions, including on the 
territorial problem. This must happen with due consideration of 
Russian national interests and complete compliance with its 
Constitution, along the path of respect for and compliance with 
international law and commitments under international treaties. 
  An immediate task is to make maximum use of the untapped 
potential in our cooperation and interaction with Russia's 
reliable partner, India. 
  A central dimension of Russian policy in the Asia-Pacific 
region is the involvement of areas of Siberia and the Far East 
in international cooperation in the region. 
  The continuation of our country's active role as one of the 
organizers of the peace process in the Near East is intended to 
promote its long-term national interests and the strengthening 
of its international influence. 
  Relations with such promising regions as Latin America and 
Africa must be raised to a qualitatively new level. 
  In general a new and graphically expressed inner philosophy 
has emerged in foreign policy recently. Cooperation structures 
in the Baltic, Black Sea, and Euro-Arctic regions have been 
created with active Russian participation. The objective is to 
activate mechanisms affecting the specific socioeconomic 
problems of vast areas of Russia. Through these mechanisms, 
while consolidating a unified state policy, federal organs must 
help the components of the Federation to realize their foreign 
economic interests. 
  The experience of the past two years has shown that any 
discord, be it departmental or regional, in foreign policy 
ultimately damages state interests and undermines Russia's 
positions in the world. The new Russian Constitution put 
everything in its place. The coordination of Russian foreign 
policy in the context of national security strategy must be 
strengthened. 
  The Federal Assembly must examine the following questions: 
  -- the ratification of around 60 international treaties; 
  -- the adoption of laws ensuring the effective functioning 
of 
the Russian foreign policy mechanism (a law on RF international 
treaties, a law on diplomatic service, and consular rules); 
  -- the adoption of laws supporting Russian foreign economic 
relations (a law on the continental shelf and economic zone, a 
law on exports of weapons and military equipment); 
  -- the elaboration of new laws or amendment of existing laws 
in the humanitarian field taking account of Russia's 
international commitments. The dual citizenship part of the Law 
on Citizenship must be brought into line with the Constitution. 
The status of foreigners in Russia must also be brought into 
line with international standards by the adoption of a 
corresponding law for this. 
  The sooner we adopt laws meeting present and future 
requirements, the greater will be the extent of the cooperation 
with foreign countries which we need so much and the more 
appreciable will be the return from the enormous opportunities 
offered by foreign policy. 
<H5>  Conclusion </H5>
  An enormous country like Russia cannot be transformed 
rapidly 
and painlessly. We need a flexible long-term policy taking 
account of world experience, national characteristics and 
traditions, the developing situation, and changes in public 
interests and sentiments. Such a policy has nothing in common 
with either conservatism or reformist dogmatism. 
  What is needed is not to strive to achieve the impossible, 
not to dissipate forces but, on the contrary, to concentrate 
resources and political will on the key areas in order to 
achieve a breakthrough to something better. When reforming, 
things must not be left absolutely to their own devices. The 
Message proposes how to organize this work. 
  The primary task is to build cooperation. The time of 
political confrontation is past. The country needs consistent, 
creative, joint work. In December 1993 tens of millions of 
people with differing views voted for the Constitution in a 
nationwide vote. In Russia today it is impossible to find a 
stronger base for achieving accord. 
  The Constitution provides an opportunity to start a real 
process of unifying all society's constructive forces and to 
channel the energy which has hitherto been expended on 
confrontation and fragmentation, into benefiting the country and 
its citizens and strengthening the Russian state. 
  Weak authorities will wreck reform and be unable to impose 
even elementary order in the country. But renewed estrangement 
between the authorities and people and their everyday needs must 
not happen either. Results can only be achieved if Russian 
people's enormous intellectual and spiritual potential and 
desire to live better are channeled into the nationwide cause of 
building [obustroystvo] Russia. The transformation of social 
life on this kind of scale demands self-restraint of everybody. 
But the authorities are obliged to start with themselves. 
  The legal basis of future constructive accord -- the 
Constitution -- must be supplemented by the formation of a 
stable political structure and a tradition of political 
tolerance in seeking common fundamental values and resolving 
nationwide tasks. Joint work by all organs of power to implement 
the program principles embedded in the Program will make it 
possible to lay the foundation of such traditions. 
  Russia needs social accord. This is why the Message takes 
account of the constructive propopals of parliamentary factions 
and other political forces and social organizations and of the 
views of academics, experts, and practicians in seeking the 
optimum way to extricate the country from crisis, strengthen the 
Russian state, and improve Russians' lives. 
  It is in our power to make 1994 the year of the building of 
creative cooperation, the year of the birth of new political 
traditions, the year of emergence from the crisis. It is our 
task, we have the chance, not to miss the opportunities which 
are opening up. 

